I begged Grey with my eyes. He ignored me, "Yes, baby girl. Do you want to see?"
the truth is i just really love making them on the weekend. and mother's day weekend wouldn't be right without them. i've shared a couple of recipes here before
Now obviously there are other pressures in the trucking industry and there are also individual factors for individual companies. But as someone who has been consistently worried about the economic outlook in Australia due to household de-leverage this turn of events in the PSI and 1st Fleets collapse reminds me of the lead in to the recession we had to have 22 years ago.
Even worse than those items made redundant in action are those that never had a chance to serve.
I decided to turn this bad experience into an experiment to see what the effects of not having a phone for five days (Please note that it is also at the business end of the week – weekend coming up) will have on me, my social life and my connection to the outside world. So for the next five days I will be blogging once daily about my experience on that day. Start how we mean to go on and all that so…
he had a girlfriend, pregnant with his baby
Secondly, know that what goes around must come back around. What you doing to others may come back on you or children. Be mindful of your actions, its not so sensible when it affect ourselves or the ones we love the dearest! Thus said the Lord as well.
Jimenez’s struggles will be even more exaggerated if the offense continues to sputter. That is my other main concern for this team. They started the year with a homerun in the first 9 games of the season and then went 11 in a row without one. You don’t have to hit homeruns to score runs, but when you struggle to manufacture runs, it sure helps. Other than the scoring surge in Kansas City, they haven’t had too many higher scoring outputs. Luckily for the most part, their pitching has kept them in games. But I still feel like the Indians haven’t played one of the elite teams in the AL yet. If their struggles continue, I cringe at the thought of having to face teams like Texas.
Photo activity: No
7. Odds are very good you’ll win a great (tax-free) door prize.
Parent/teacher conferences were that evening. Conferences can be stressful because you never know what to expect. The first parents walked in, sat down at the round table with me and smiled as they asked, "Shoot any bunnies lately?"
Correct your listed age. Better to underpromise and overdeliver on dating Web sites, and elsewhere, than to play it in reverse. There is also the small matter of honesty with potential mates. Why not be the youngest-looking 43-year-old on the Internet?
They are simply acknowledging this while attesting to the fact that the energies we are being given now at this end-time in our 3D experience and this beginning-time of our higher dimensional experience, are much more pure than the aide given by the cannabis plant and other physical plants, as these plants contain ‘pockets’ of spiritual help and advancement so to speak, wrapped up in the densities of burning these plants along with not asking for permission or recognizing the sanctity of these plants or their ancient and sacred nature on our world.
155. Shrimp in brisket rub @ Mom & Dad’s house (Pottstown, PA) 5:40 p.m.
who makes your heart jump
05 Oochie Coochie
Residents and community members are responsible for the purchase of any hardware or software needed, but labor and diagnostics are provided free of charge. It is advised that guests call ahead to reserve a spot.
I love the way it looks and it's much sturdier than I ever expected, mounted on an iron frame. Though you'd never know it from this terrible iPhone photo, the beads are a fun, vibrant color which I think will look great in the room. It was promptly added to the ever growing "staging area" pile of stuff that will eventually make it's way into the room once we paint and assemble the closet.
This entry is mandatory, if you do not do #1, you cannot do the "extra" entries. Comments like "enter me" will not be eligible!
Why can't I support my husband the way she supports hers?
* Give the royal icing at least 2 days to dry.
I'll drink the nettles down
De la Reina de los Cielos,
Following the often manic ‘pose down’ the placings are announced in reverse order until only one competitor is left on stage and crowned the winner.
The US official’s words put an end to Macedonia’s slim hopes that it may get anything more than warm words at the forthcoming summit in the US.
After coming home from two hours of talking with a most wonderful woman there, Tim and I did talk about a few things and have come to a few more decisions. As far as that goes, I am feeling pretty good about our general plan of action. However, it has put me in a pretty somber mood most of the rest of the day.
Does that mean we can't write about violence, cruelty and horror? Of course not. It's just as important to document the dark side of ourselves, the savagery, the self interest, all the bad things we do to each other - because ignoring things doesn't make them go away - even though Wallace Wattles (the original 'secret' inventor of "The Secret") might have disagreed!
This one isn’t bad, but it rather hamstrings the ability for humans to interact with other aliens, doesn’t it? Like, if none of them are as ambitious as us, then don’t they just kinda get pushed aside? In some settings, they do, actually (in my own setting of Alandar, in fact), but to rob all your aliens of the capacity to be equally ambitious makes it easy to either demonize or glorify humanity in a way that makes things unfair. In Avatar, for example, humanity’s ambition is demonized as destructive and cruel. In Star Trek, it’s glorified as the thing that makes us the leaders of the Federation. In both cases, we are seeing human uniqueness being used as a symbol for what the authors think of human behavior, rather than a realistic portrait of those cultural or physical qualities that make us distinct.
Luckily, I was able to touch base with fellow FS blogger Connie from Whale Ears & Other Wonderings. She very generously offered to pick me up at the hotel, and we went to The Blue Fig Cafe for lunch. What a wonderful time! Over great food, we had an absolutely lovely time 'meeting' each other. The FS blogger community is pretty neat in its ability to link people across the globe who may never have met in person but who have a lifestyle in common. Connie took me on a driving tour of Amman, which helped immensely for getting my bearings. We stopped at her house where I got to meet her famous family and kitties (well, two of them at least!). I felt as if I already knew them through her blog - pretty cool :-). Our last stop for the afternoon was to Sugar Daddy's bakery! I first heard about this place when I was in Arabic training in 2009, and I'd wanted to go ever since. And, just a word of caution, be prepared when you google Sugar Daddy's Amman. It's a few results down... We enjoyed blissful cupcakes and took a few each home. Connie dropped me off, and I finished off a perfect day with a perfect massage at the spa.
“Happy Catsmas to All—and no deer next year!!!"
I am going to try, I’m not making any promises, but I’m really going to try and give you a blog entry every other day from Kenya to tell you how it is going! Note I didn’t say everyday!! So please do stick with me and do read and comment the blog – it will be great to hear what you think.
perlu i cakap lagi ke?
Taking the Bible literally, such individuals are equally guilty as homosexuals.
So what do you know?
Most people would agree that voice-over-IP (VoIP) services are pretty cool. Videophones are one of those future-tech staples used in movies for years and have since become a reality. Even without video, the ability to call someone cheaply or even for free, and likely with greater call clarity from your PC, tablet or smartphone over the internet is compelling. On the face of it, VoIP seems superior to landline or mobile phone services in almost every way, and yet, mysteriously, it has not taken off for the majority of people as their primary point of contact. Why is this the case? Why is it that Skype or Google Talk calls often need to be organized in advance, and via a completely different method of communication?
The queer bars, the scars
terrifying: snakes and poisonous reptiles devour their
In the season's final two episodes, Will's investigation dovetails with the team's pursuit of a terrorist named Kateb, who is planning an attack on US soil. There are some very bold choices in these episodes--doubly so, as they both frustrate viewers' expectations from this kind of story, and clearly demonstrate the writers' belief that, despite its terrible ratings, Rubicon would be granted a second season. Even if the renewal had happened, I'm not sure I would have said that the season ends well--reintroducing Will into the office storyline allows him to take over it, and overshadow the more developed characters, and the season doesn't so much end as stop--so for all the praise I've heaped on Rubicon, I can't offer it any but the most qualified recommendation. I'd like it to be watched, and not just by television writers eager to embrace the fashion for 'realism' who maybe need a few pointers in how to do it well. There are characters here, like Kale, Grant, Miles, and Tanya, who I would have loved to spend more time with and that I'd like other people to get to know (if only because the actors, Howard and Roberts in particular, deserve recognition for their work). I can't feel too sorry for Rubicon as it aired, but I do regret the show that might have been, the workplace drama about people with an unusual, challenging, important job who are not always the superheroes they need to be to do it well.
And change it we did!
Ticket revenues increasing by £2.8m (18.6%) to £18.2m…
The Beginning (1/4)
Cut 2 of these: 4 1/2 inches X WOF, then trim them so that each handle measures 27 1/2 inches in length.
Additionally, the show has spawned sales in T-shirts, food items, and other merchandise sporting the faces of the show’s actors. It has sparked fashion trends with Middle Eastern women who want to wear the styles worn by the female characters. Saudi hospitals are reporting that the hottest names for newborn babies are Noor and Mohannad, after the show’s two main characters. On the West Bank, posters depicting the show’s characters have out sold the prior hot sellers, Yasser Arafat and Saddam Hussein. And the most popular ring tone for mobile phones in the whole region is the show’s theme song.
ball by cupping your hands gently around it. Apply a light downward pressure to the sides, while simultaneously rotating the dough continuously in a steady clockwise direction. Continue until the dough is formed into an even round shape. This recipe specifies an extended chafing time. To tell you the truth, I have no idea what this does for the dough, but I did end up with a nice round ball that held its shape well even when rolled. I will definitely use this technique again.
Hot and Cold.
I sent both John and Kathy an email to see if either of them were at all interested in doing a training. Both were and after months of working out all the details we have it set.
She laughs at every word I say and brushes her hand against me knee,
One more dress to show you for the Hopeful Threads sew-along to support Dress A Girl Around the World. This dress isn't mine. It's the first dress my daughter has ever sewn. It was about time I helped her with sewing.
This terror, cold, wet-furred, small-clawed,
3) Sensicare lotion. My hands always stay so dry during the winter. Probably because I work in a medical clinic. You know who goes to medical clinics? Sick people! So I am constantly washing my hands or, worse, using that horrible alcohol hand sanitizer. My hands were cracked to the point of bleeding last night when Shawn said one of the nurses that he works with suggested using this stuff. After a dose last night and another this morning, I'm happy to report that my hands are as smooth as a baby's behind. Will definitely be keeping this stuff around the house.
I took a photograph of a Great Blue Heron cruising over the clear waters of lake. It did appear in a prior post of mine, Audubon Inspired Photos.
06-14 Miami, FL – Grand Central
If you have a minute, please write your state senator and let them know that this is not they way we should be operating.
please help me. please hit me. just let me close my eyes and die.
Patience hurts sometimes.
Fresh basil, parsley or mint cut in chiffonade (ribbons)
How is that mouth now? Does it still feel gentle and soft and sweet? Or has it become rough and harsh and sour?
According to two MI5 sources, in 1942 Victor Rothschild became MI5's security inspector, which allowed him into every major research centre. He knew in detail about all British (and often US) weapons developments. Under the guise of the inspector who was checking facilities to see if they were vulnerable to Nazi spying, the Fifth Man became the espionage agent.
Part of the fun is that each recipient MUST share 3 unknown (or little known) facts about herself.
Flocks of pigeons
“You may experience some cramping and heavy bleeding, and possibly some chills and nausea. But most issues will resolve themselves in two weeks.”
In late August 1859 the most severe solar storm ever witnessed began and lasted through the first few days of September. It produced vivid auroras in the night sky as far south as Cuba and was so bright campers in the Rocky Mountains got up in the middle of the night thinking daylight had arrived. During the storm telegraph operators felt as if some alien force had overtaken their equipment. Even disconnecting power to the wires failed to quiet their telegraphs. In some places the paper strip used to record the dots and dashes of Morse code caught fire because of the electrical surges coursing through the telegraph lines.
He drove me home and before I got out of the car, he asked me “if this was good,” as he quickly pointed back and forth between him and me. I said “yes, absolutely.” He gave me a slightly less sloppy, but longer kiss, and I got out of his car and went into the house. It was 2am. That first date had lasted six hours.
Money comes in and leaves you
Ok, I recently got asked about my experience with PCOS (PolyCystic Ovarian Syndrome). I have written things here and there about it, but I don't think that I've ever really written about the whole experience or whatever. I have met a few other bloggers who, bless them, have the same condition.
I am happy to say that I found that in an incredible man. For privacy reasons, I will refer to him as Mr. M. He has already shown me and my kids such love and support that I am blown away. He saw some pictures that I took of Genesis' 5th birthday this last March and how I took her flowers and such, and he told me he wished that he had known me then so that he could come with me and show his support. He said he would have brought her flowers as well. He lets me talk about her all I want without judgement and one time while talking to her he even broke down and cried. This is a huge deal as he doesn't cry easily, even when his ex father in law (who he was very close to) passed away. He was even surprised by it. He has a really good heart. We talk a lot about the future and said he would consider it an honor if he could join me in remembering Genesis on her birthday every year and any other time during the year that I wanted.
So no frosts yet -- peppers, raspberries and tomatoes still ripening, basil chugging along, though the whiteflies are getting to it. We got a satisfying amount of food out of the yard this summer and I'm happy with how much I've preserved, either as jams, jellies and pickles, or dehydrated and then vacuum sealed in jars, or in the freezers, which are full to bursting.
Of course she can’t track who then purchased but if even just 1% did an actual buy, that would be a solid 100 copies in one day.
1. Raspberry Spring Chicken Salad: Grilled Cajun chicken on a
1 – no unnecessary acceleration
Dry roast semiya/vermicelli in a wide pan or pressure pan till light pink/brown. Remove and keep aside.
Kraft Patterned Paper - My Mind's Eye
“But we are not using the Waterfront. We are only want to use the open space at the old courthouse, which is a public place.
If you look at the latest Gordon’s Gin Commercial here, which nicely pokes a little gentle fun at wine bores whilst promoting a decent mainstream drink with unpretentious values you wonder why so many think aping the pretention of wine bores is any way to promote beer. Beer in most of its forms, pongy ale included, is a decent enjoyable unpretentious drink. Promoting values it already possesses appears a better strategy than copying the nonsense associated with wine.
Collar - Dorothy Perkins
What if they hated it?
The time machine was much more believable than a hot tub, however once they went back in time there was one farfetched scene. A brontosaurus is close by and Dr. Reno says it’s an herbivore don’t worry it won’t bother them. They casually ignore it, B.S.!!! Anyone in their right mind would run from a seventy foot dinosaur whether it’s a vegetarian or not!
And it turns out that my sister is brilliant.
Bring me my Arrows of desire:
When I started my research into the allegations of the “Others,” (Episcopalians of course), I was confounded by the absolute lack of any credible evidence of atrocities in Lebanon or the West bank or Gaza committed by Israel. The most Orwellian part of this international collaboration against Israel is they managed to get a South African Jewish Judge to conduct an investigation, (The Goldstone Report), which found Israel wanting and guilty. I was dumbfounded… times three. What am I missing? Jewish Judge, South African, judging Israel?
This Sunday is even more special. If you don't know Dulverton and you live within kicking distance of this small Exmoor town (in Somerset, but you're nobbut a hop and a jump from Devon), could I invite you to come over for Dulverton by Starlight. The roads will be open (yes, I know, those pesky road works have been a pain but the nice guys from South Wales promise me). The shops will be open late and most put on mince pies, mulled wine and so on. There's all the usual malarkey (Father Christmas, church fair, horse and carriage trips, a display of cribs) but mainly it's just rather lovely and bustly and twinkly. The pubs are buzzing, the parking is free and it all ends with a delicious firework display over the church.
-By posting about my writing (which is following my dream), life and family on Facebook and Twitter
However, if you use a Wags 'n Whiskers image on your card, you will be entered into a separate drawing for a free WnW Digital Stamp!! Two chances to win!
The butterfly has been cut out from 1934. I added some Distress Stickles Rock Candy to it to make it sparkle. The chipboard is from Imaginarium and has been painted with white Gesso and distressed with Distress Ink Walnut Stain (so has the papers). Rose from Wild Orchid Crafts.
For someone who is very neutral oriented :) I'm amazed at how good the red I see is making me feel and I'm happy about that. For so many years I was determined to do non traditional colors. I wish I had photos of my silver trees-- purple trees- even lime green trees.. I'm starting to think someone really can change, cause I sure am craving tradition this year..
There is an incredible amount design inspiration out there but make some room for the eclectic, cool and unbearably thoughtful work of Piet Hein Eek, a dutch designer that works with scraps, reclaimed wood and more. His acclaimed work has been noted, most recently at the 2011 ICFF show happening now in New York. From a home office interpreted as a log cabin to the Door Project to a streamlined brass and glass case for artist Guido Geeleen, his portfolio also expands to include reclaimed scrapwood pieces, ceramic accents, plywood projects, aluminum style as well as collaborations and more. Oh and his shop and restaurant are equally design friendly.
One moment I’d like to forget is… Calling a bloke I know really well, by someone else’s name. Not just someone’s name, someone he detests, name! Argh, I can still feel the heat from my face.
While in Minnesota their dark jerseys were black with purple and forest green trim, but following their move to Canada, the green was given top billing, with black and purple as the secondary colors. In addition, perhaps the greatest font in the history of hockey jerseys was designed for the numbers, each digit incorporating an antler! The jerseys adopted by the Moose during their first season of play in Winnipeg featured a diagonal "check mark" waist stripe, which remained in use through the 2000-01 season, after which the purple color was replaced by copper and the waist stripe changed to a more conventional horizontal stripe.
Despite the ongoing engine freeze, Ian Bamsey discovers some significant powertrain developments at the British Grand Prix
The other week, Nina Planck published an article about the risks of raising vegan children and I thought I’d answer some of the statements she made. You can find the article here that I’m referring to: Is Veganism Good for Everyone?
“But, but don’t you want a boyfriend?” Wendy asked with a tint of hurt in her voice.
In all, Jurassic Park 2: The Chaos Continues is one of the better old-school JP games. It has very little resemblance to the movie or book, but it is very fun and quite challenging.
answer to all paper proposals submitted. If you do
Well it’s that time of year again! Time for my favorite holiday: Passover. A time to gather with family and friends, eat, drink a ton of wine (Manischewitz if you can handle it) and basically enjoy one of the best foods in the world, Matzo Ball soup. Oh, I will be posting the soup sometime this week. Don’t you worry. But until then, it’s time to put away the flour and the leavening agents and get down to some kosher for Passover dessert.
Because of their connections to Europe, many of the comic book makers of 1941 were a little ahead of the curve as far as American involvement in stopping Hitler. That first spectacular Hitler punch-out cover of Captain America #1 came out nine months before America entered the War.
“Yes, I want to kiss you,” he said correcting me (though I didn’t notice the correction).
and they have powerful forces behind them.
Wow...we needed to do some shoe shopping with the kids. Everyone had outgrown their shoes or else they'd worn them to the point they looked disgusting.
before April 1
When the crime statistics were attacked in the first case challenging the Atlantic Yards environmental review, Supreme Court Justice Joan Madden punted, writing that "since the incidence of crime is just one of the factors in determining blight... petitioners' arguments as to the accuracy of the crime statistics need not be addressed."
The Lord will rescue me from all evil and take me safely into His Heavenly Kingdom. To Him be the glory forever and ever! Amen!
Late Night Frequently Asked Questions (FAQs) Webinar.
In a discussion of the event with him, he said, “No one yet has noted that BP drilled into a monstrous oil and gas reservoir; a reservoir which could replace much of our imported foreign oil. Such a well dwarfs the best Saudi wells.”
The final curtain, as Law Professor Avi Bell relates, had to have come three days before Goldstone's whining little apologia in the Washington Post, sitting there at Stanford Law School with his wife next to him and watching Bell and Peter Berkowitz tear apart Goldstone's abysmal tissue of lies to his face:
In a head-scratching reversal, I came across an article about an Origins ad that used a younger model to sell a skincare product targeting women between the ages of 45-60. Last summer, model Caroline Louise Forsling sued Estée Lauder for using her photo, apparently without her knowledge or permission. Not only did Caroline allegedly not participate in the skincare trial (as we're to believe the miraculous—I mean obviously Photoshopped—half of her face depicts), she's apparently 35.
By the late 1530’s, his health began to deteriorate and he took on an anti-Semitic bent by accusing the Jews of exploiting the confusion he had caused among Christians. This made him virtually unable to locate a decent doctor, and he died on Feb. 18, 1546. His obituary, printed several days later in the Eisleben Picayune-Examiner, included a long list of his works, an even longer list of his children, and the name of his new religion: Martinism, which was later changed to Luthermania, then Lutheranism.
R - About sixteen and a half stone.
AE said: “When my agent told me Strange Chemistry was interested, I think I squealed out loud. Angry Robot has an amazing reputation, and to be welcomed into their YA imprint? Bliss. Nerdvana. I'm absolutely thrilled to be with Strange Chemistry and working with Amanda.”
What is AMBUSH MARKETING?
Hey, media moguls! We understand the point WITHOUT you trotting out a family member in the throes of grief. So why are they always part of the story? Simple! They’re great for ratings! The person looks tormented, the anchor looks sympathetic, and somehow this is all considered quite proper.
She is currently represented by Dawn Dowdle of Blue Ridge Literary Agency. Wanita is a writer of Young Adult, Fantasy Fiction and where ever else her little muses take her.
Oremus Pro Invicem
So, I don't really have a relationship with my mother.
Let the critics be critics. Let you, the president, be president! That’s all that we want. You must not use us, the critics, as an excuse for your failure. And we, the critics, must not use your tears as an excuse to quit our job. As far as I can see, nobody asked you to rule with impunity. All that you are asked is to show some audacity. If you don’t have it in you, just convince us that there is sanity in our polity. Is that too much to ask for? You don’t have to be the King of Syria to change the lives of Nigerians. Whatever pact you have with God, that is between you and your God. What we, the critics, think is the reason why you are there is more important than what you think is the reason why God placed you there. Just in case you have forgotten, you are there to serve us. You said you wanted to do so. And by every means possible, you got yourself there. Now that you’re there, do what presidents are supposed to do. Gear up and guide the nation. Don’t sit there and grumble. God does not use grumbling men to change a society. Passionate men who pledged their honor, their fortunes and their lives grab the horn and turn their society around. Only the dead do not have forces bent on frustrating them. A market woman has forces bent on tearing her ten kobo bag. So get over yourself. Get over the excuses. Get over the self-pity. Give us results. Inspire us. Nothing you say will make the forces against you to pull back. The more you look like a pussy, the more they push you around.
5. Worthington paisley skirt, $6.99
I’ll work on a better name for it…
The San Diego-based LRAD Corporation has previously sold the device to the US Army, which deployed them in Iraq for crowd control.
So while everyone is excited to open gifts I'm excited to see the pure joy on their faces. Because that and the warm memories I get spending time with my family is all that I could ever ask for.
When I meet a shrink that shares that perspective, I’ll let them help me out. In the mean time…no dice.
· November 18, 2011 10:00 PM
A frightened young girl attempts to convince her parents of the “monsters” outside.
Sustein defines false conspiracy theories as being “an attempt to explain an event or practice by reference to the machinations of powerful people, who have also managed to conceal their role”.
Sarah Pinborough – Diary Entry #2
On the one side I myself sympathize with the transwomen's contention and on the other side I find myself agreeing that those transmen who have felt the awesomely destructive power of the word tranny should reclaim it if they wish.
But not this time. Much as the Commando’s disappearance has left me raw and disbelieving, his prior presence has provided latent strength to pull myself up by my bootstraps and tackle something that I can influence. Enervating pain turns to productive anger. I’m NOT useless, boring, unlovable. I can’t be. But I am alone and enmeshed in a life I don’t understand and a career I don’t enjoy.
32. Thee Headcoats - Headcoat Lane
Last weekend, the same Mr. Savage, addressing the National High School Journalism Convention, speaking in the context of anti-bullying legislation, implied that the Bible’s teaching on sexuality encourages the bullying of homosexuals. So he encouraged his hearers to “ignore the bull***t in the Bible” that modern thinkers have overcome, specifically the three S’: slavery, shellfish and sexuality. Appropriately, many Christians in attendance walked out of the lecture and were subsequently taunted by the speaker (who later apologized for his taunts, but not for his remarks about the Bible).
the Austrian side of the Bavarian Alps
The background:
Erm… sorry, just swallowing. Now the wine is making you flatter me, Barbara: I must say I don't see myself as doing anything so grand as renewing the short story! All I'm doing, I have to say, is telling things the way I see them. And I simply couldn't tell them the way I see them if didn't use the modes I do.
Still, as I said, I minor quibble given the overall quality of this film. I love Hogancamp, and I love this movie.
When I started off with this project I decided from the very start that I wanted to have something that would be usable by everyone for their own worlds as well as have a concrete universe built that contains enough history and information to be playable but not too much to detract from the game.
I’ve been working ten hours a day on my novel and on various other writing projects. My neck is u-shaped.
By around Noon or so we were all talking/hanging out, when I noticed, “Mike”. I had seen him earlier in his wheelchair but had been praying for someone else. I’m always a little reserved/hesitant to pray for people in wheelchairs. My faith typically shrinks by the reality of “WHEELCHAIR” rather than the reality of “GOD”. Forgive us, Abba. I grabbed Sammy and we went over to Mike and asked what had happened. He shared the story of his return to the Bronx last December from a vacation out west. While in the cab ride back from the airport a large delivery truck had smashed into the cab. Both his legs were crushed from the knees down. The doctor did not anticipate salvaging his legs. Surgery was successful (praise God!) although he had not been able to use his legs at all since. They had just checked his legs two weeks prior and told him that his legs were in no condition to carry his body. Over the past year both legs had felt completely numb with no feeling whatsoever other than pain. I thanked him for sharing his story and asked if we could pray over his legs. He agreed (BTW – I’ve found MOST people will let you pray over them especially when you approach them in genuine compassion and ask them about their condition/problem/etc.) We began praying a short prayer commanding his legs to be made whole. Pain leave, muscles, bones, tendons be strengthened. Legs work and operate the way you were made to! Then I asked Mike what he was feeling. He said, “You know, it’s funny. It’s almost like someone shot electricity down my knee caps into my legs.” I asked if he normally felt these “shocks”. He responded that he had never in his life felt anything like them. Ha! It’s on! The first sign of an instant healing miracle is often something happening in a person’s body that is completely out of the ordinary (such as heat, cooling, electricity, buzzing). It’s not always the case that they feel something, but often they do. Either way, if you have a heart to see people healed, don’t let feelings dictate what you believe about God’s character and heart for others. Just because we don’t “feel” anything, doesn’t mean God isn’t actively at work.
Freshly squeezed lemon juice
Numbness spreads through my veins
This is why I believe it is essential to join the social conversation, because without it, it may become increasingly difficult to stay truly connected. Not only to your close friends, family and loved ones, but also to the businesses that offer special deals online. It may also become more strenuous to find career opportunities and prospective employment, without showcasing your talents, education, skills and goals online.
Throughout Christendom, Protestantism was menaced by formidable foes. The first triumphs of the Reformation past, Rome summoned new forces, hoping to accomplish its destruction. At this time the order of the Jesuits was created, the most cruel, unscrupulous, and powerful of all the champions of popery. Cut off from earthly ties and human interests, dead to the claims of natural affection, reason and conscience wholly silenced, they knew no rule, no tie, but that of their order, and no duty but to extend its power. The gospel of Christ had enabled its adherents to meet danger and endure suffering, undismayed by cold, hunger, toil, and poverty, to uphold the banner of truth in face of the rack, the dungeon, and the stake. To combat these forces, Jesuitism inspired its followers with a fanaticism that enabled them to endure like dangers, and to oppose to the power of truth all the weapons of deception. There was no crime too great for them to commit, no deception too base for them to practice, no disguise too difficult for them to assume. Vowed to perpetual poverty and humility, it was their studied aim to secure wealth and power, to be devoted to the overthrow of Protestantism, and the re-establishment of the papal supremacy.
Sesame seeds, ¼ cup, toasted until golden brown
Him being a table setter for the four power hitters behind him (Brennan Boesch, Cabrera, Fielder and Delmon Young) will make the Tigers offense that much better. And it could be one of the big keys in helping the Tigers accomplish their goal of bringing a World Series title back to Motown.
There is one particular sideshow style act I want to mention, though, because it is very much associated withConey Islandand ended up influencing vaudeville.
For the outside sentiments,i've again used My Creative Time's WOW! So Many Candles Stamp Set and for the inside her new Floral Sentimens!
3 leave
Road salt and grit had been flicked up into the chain, cogs and dérailleur arm as I was riding. Each pedal stroke now came with crunching, grinding soundtrack as this mix worked its way into the gears. Despite the rubber cover over it, the shifter arm also suffered and changing gear required more effort.
Bcc:
“What!? Where?” I was certain that the vengeful Andy had come to seek his revenge by murdering us in cold blood. They’d have to drag the pond to find our bones…
No hugs for anyone,
that life would be million times better
Unfortunately, I've had all this in my closet for a bit, so you're not going to find them in stores...thank goodness there are tons of black and white stripe tops and floral skirts, right? (c:
#264 - LISA PAYNE
08. Generation
ANDERS BREIVIK is an extensive blogger whose online rants about politics expose him as a Nazi sympathiser.
swiss chard pancakes with smoked trout, creme fraiche & dill
If you have a custom crystal pendant commission you can contact allison@taniamarie.com to present your request. Pendants are available for purchase and any questions you may have you can also direct to Allison. The new batch of Lemurian L.O.V.E. Seed Crystal sphere pendants are still available. (I apologize I won’t be continuing to share their individual photos for now, but one will be intuited for you if you make a purchase). About half are already gone, but half remain of this lot. They can be purchased here, along with other beautiful, loving and empowering creations: http://www.etsy.com/shop/JoyfulEarthCrystals
“You don’t have any other choice sweety. There is no other way of getting out of this cell except from the key I’m holding in my hands.”
i carry your heart with me(i carry it in
Finding inspiration, finding new ideas, itching to try them out. Starting on trying them out. Loosing motivation halfway through. Because of the anxiety that wells up every time the thought of how to pay next month’s rent occurs.
The coauthors hope these meaningful readings will help you deal with guilt--both real and imagined. By applying the insights shared in Turning Guilt Trips into Joy Rides, you may develop a calmer, less guilt-ridden life-style and become better equipped to function as wives, mothers and friends. Younger women often develop patterns of thinking and experience feelings of guilt that carry over into their mature
you don't even question where
Not another creature was stirring,
Pakistan is one of the most corrupt nations on the planet. That is fact, not hyperbole. I speak from personal experience. I’ve done business there since the mid-1970s and indeed on behalf of local executives and major companies there. (Most curiously and serendipitously, Ms. Durrani’s father is now the senior executive of one of my former clients.)
4) Some little punk brat hit Kyan at the McDonald's playground yesterday. He is STILL talking about "the kid in the red shirt" and how he schooled him on how you're "not sposed to hit people." I'm really proud of my kid for not hitting the jerk back. Mainly because he's the last of my children I would expect to resolve a fight with words. He certainly never misses an opportunity to (attempt to) body slam his brother.
Sally-Ann...xx
Its fading now, just a lingering tickle in my throat and cough which is good but It really knocked me for a few days.
I know why we're here.
We did it ourselves!
The Birthday, Idrissa Ouédraogo, Burkina Faso. Comedy/Thriller, 12 min.
With great lyrics
All of these things will soon be a distant memory for me. I’m so glad I have the photos to help remind me of the smell and feel and sounds and tastes of SE Asia now that it’s getting near the end. I hope you’ve enjoyed it too through what I’ve written about, but hey, I still have two weeks in Bangkok!!! Get ready for more!!
“There is no Dana, only Zuul!” Our long-awaited 6” figure of Dana Barrett as Zuul from the first Ghostbusters™ features authentic, film-accurate sculpting right down to her golden gown. And, with two interchangeable lower bodies she can stand or, when she tires of waiting for the coming of Gozer, sit on the included bench display.
* Oceanographers
I didn’t had really time for this makeup, thats why the eyebrows aren’t perferct, and my skin looks a little patchy. I don’t own a very light foundation so I used a light mineral foundation mixed with Fyrinnae Marshmallow Puffs, to achieve the glowy look of the skin. On the closeups you can see that the lines of the fake false lashes are uneven. I’m sorry for that but my gel liner was at this point very dry and it was time to get a new one. I also rushed, because I did not have very much time for this look. I hope it’s okay tough..
So, any of you parents out there, might be familiar with the amount of "stuff" that comes with having kids, and there is no exception when it comes to the kitchen. For us, it's a matter of storing kid specific dishes, utensils, bibs and vitamins. And this cabinet was all about getting organized for zero dollars, using things from around the homestead to keep the space tidy.
I LOVE creamy chicken and wild rice soup! I am making a standard chicken soup in the crock but adding a little "creaminess" at the end. (I used a few basic recipes to create this one, so this will be new for me this week, as well!) I may sneak some organic butter into this but avoid all other dairy (my little guy is not allergic to dairy but we avoid it for the most part due to his asthma, as dairy can be an irritant to this condition or for anyone that has a cold or flu bug, for that matter!) If you cannot do any dairy, sub in ghee or a another DF butter substitute. OR just eat this without the roux/milk mix added at the end for a classic chicken and rice soup. I will update this post with photos and the taste result, would love to hear if you try this during the week, as well!
9. What is something you wish for every day? That Taylor will be agreeable when I put her down for naptime/bedtime. It's my least favorite time of the day :)
- The Charta Sacra - Sancto Scripturae, a chronological analysis of the Old and New Testaments (7th Ed.),
Bob Chapman: The Financial Powers That Be Are In A Trap of Their Own Making! Alex Jones: Government Claims Osama Wanted to Kill Obama! Syria Regime Marked for Death as US, UK Move Swiftly To Split Libya! John Embry & James Turk: Gold And Silver Going Alot Higher! Tears Of Gaza! Genocide And Ethnic Cleansing of Palestinians by Zionist ’666′ Israel ! Gaza: The Killing Zone! Mass Murder by Zionist ’666′ Israel ! ’666′ Star of David, Satanic Curse / Hex(agram) On Humanity! Occult Symbol.
Collapse: How Societies Choose to Fail or Succeed, by Jared Diamond: he “employs the comparative method to understand societal collapses to which environmental problems contribute.” He lists 12 environmental problems facing mankind today. The first eight have historically contributed to the collapse of past societies: (1) Deforestation and habitat destruction; (2) Soil problems (erosion, salinization, and soil fertility losses); (3) Water management problems (4) Overhunting; (5) Overfishing; (6) Effects of introduced species on native species; (7) Overpopulation; (8) Increased per-capita impact of people. The root problem in all but one of Diamond's factors leading to collapse is overpopulation relative to the practicable (as opposed to the ideal theoretical) carrying capacity of the environment.
If you dig into the data, it does indeed show that, on average, stay-at-home moms are more likely to be young, foreign-born and less-educated than moms as a whole. But that’s hardly a stake in the heart of the idea that you’re seeing a lot of women with college degrees stepping out of the workforce. In fact, though college-educated moms are slightly less likely to be at-home moms, a whopping 1.8 million of the 5.6 million at-home moms have a college diploma. That’s hardly a “small population.”
I don't have a favorite Milonga on Tuesdays and Wednesdays, both nights are good at El Beso. The one time that I visited Nuevo Chique on a Tuesday was very enjoyable. Wednesday night at La Nacional is also fun.
Simplicity & Minimalism
And look their victims in the eyes
1. Bread sustains life and wine is good for the blood and gladdens the spirit.
It has been revealed that the US soldier who sneaked out of a military base and went on a shooting spree that left 16 Afghan civilians dead, had suffered a traumatic brain injury. The soldier, whose name has not been disclosed, could face the death penalty, and will be tried in the US military justice system, Defense Secretary Leon Panetta said.
After 3 weeks in primary fermentation at 66-68 degrees it came all the way down to 1.002! This yeast is a beast! Serioiusly. I didn't think that was even possible to ferment out that completely without champagne yeast. Sampling it during bottling, it had a nice sharp fruitiness of citrus and apples and a slick mouthfeel. It's fantastic! Should be nice and dry.
Just shortly after 6:00 am (yes, we began early) we dropped quickly by first bike station-information table and bike tune-up checkpoint along the popular Bow River bike-pedestrian path. Too bad we didn’t stay long enough for scones –they were being delivered as we mounted onto our bikes for short twirl over to Eau Claire Market Square for free pancakes, sausage, oatmeal and coffee.
i also have to give a shoutout to the sweet louise of table tonic for mentioning me in this round of (always fabulous) 14 bookmark-worthy sites! i'm hoping for some time this weekend to check all of her recommendations out.
Happy Easter to secular folks , the Gaming Gang and any Christian Readers, Happy Passover to any Jewish readers and have a happy Feast of Eostra for my Pagan readers.
Only one relates to (guaca)mole,
Anak ng P , talaga!
Peter Nelson
The Association for Progressive Communications (APC) has developed a series of briefings to help those working on-line improve the security of their computer and on-line communications. The briefings were developed as part of a project aimed at improving the on-line security of computer users such as journalists and human rights workers. But the content of the briefings is relevant for all those working on-line.
In the wake of a tragic boating accident that killed her friends, 16-year-old Miranda is consumed by guilt. She has no memory of how she managed to survive the crash, only the murky dreams of a strange boy in the dark water. Her only refuge is in the late-night swims she takes alone— until one night on the beach when she meets Christian, a boy who seems eerily familiar, but keeps many secrets.
1/2 cup walnuts, finely chopped
- Willing to be placed all over Auto2000 branches
Now in being fair and unbalanced, please make sure skip to the last 20 seconds to witness the vocalize styling of truly the next American Gospel superstar.
Thus she consented to become his wife, and when they were married, she brought with her a wonderful dowry - all the cattle, sheep, goats and horses she could count before she ran out of breath were granted by her father. Once again, the boy was warned that should he strike her three times without cause, he would lose her. After the wedding, she counted rapidly, in fives, and thus her dowry of livestock was indeed a handsome one. But should those causeless blows ever be struck, he was once again warned by her father, not just she but all her dowry, would return from whence they came.
Another bonus of Sisel’s Elegance Nail System is the easy removal. With the special Soak Off Solution, you only need ten minutes to remove one color and be ready for a new look. All of this is ideal for women in this business because Elegance takes all of the advantages of network referrals and, through Sisel’s amazing business, makes a stable and lucrative personal business possible.
Shamnad had some time back discussed with me the idea of application of the Orphan Drug Act (ODA) to section 3(d) the Indian patent act. Specifically Shamnad had suggested using the ODA test (clinical superiority test based on patient care rather than one on structural similarity) and applying it to section 3(d).
Need I say more?
I don't know why I'm mentioning this, but the manner in which Mark Hunter carried his knapsack was exactly the same as one of my friends back in high school.
hair.
We eagerly and anxiously wait for "the call" this year. We've also begun discussions on topics that need prayer:
Hello! And Welcome to "Detailed4U Collections" I love to spend my time and attention to detail 4U. I specialize in handmade embellishments, paper bag scrapbooks, and altered items. I have included some of my tissue paper flowers, book flowers as well as some cupcake flowers that I make in the prize package and also just for you guys for the next thirty days you can use the coupon code: FROSTED and receive 10% OFF of anything in my shop!! ENJOY and happy scrapping!!!
Diving is of course a raw nerve with Arsenal. Robert Pires is our most celebrated culprit and was castigated nearly a decade ago for the ease of his loss of footing. The Frenchman quickly learned and enhanced his reputation with this redemption. And this is before we consider our Brazilian Croat whose career was effectively ended by ill-founded and scurrilous Uefa claims backed by the media.
After about 30 minutes we started shooting the photo of her crashing the bowling ball into the road and it was such a fun shot especially when I started requesting her to scream thinking of her as the HULK lol.
When I started our blog, we were living in Dubai, United Arab Emirates - land of censored internet, where anything with a rude word was not viewable, and some blogs were blocked because someone would take offence at the slightest criticism of the U.A.E. and all hell would break loose. I was never going to set the blogging world alight by discussing anything of great importance, and the main reason for the blog was so that friends and family, living at numerous points around the globe, could keep track of us as we travelled and experienced new adventures. Since leaving the U.A.E., I have relaxed and posted the occasional image of us and share a little more personal information than before, but I'm happy to keep ourselves relatively anonymous. After all, our friends and family know who we are, and anyone who wants further details can email us.
Jeepers. Like Snickers could get any worse for you--now it's got caffeine in it? And what the hell is taurine? Further investigation (thank you, Wikipedia!) reveals that taurine is an "organic acid", and a "major constituent of bile". Yum! I can only assume the good folks at Snickers have included it in their limited-time-only version of a Power Bar because it's been shown in diabetic lab rats to decrease weight and sugar levels. Awesome! B-vitamins, though, that's something that's actually good for you, though, right? Except, since there are like, 22 different b-vitamins, it's kind of hard to know exactly which ones the Snickers people mean. So who knows what you're getting, there.
Aamir Khan’s personal life
Gert here. This is pure HO/JW.
Adrift in a country with no cultural compass, most new buyers are at the mercy of the agent they choose. These people become not only their “home finder” but also their interpreter of Bulgarian culture. Good agents help with more than just house hunting, ultimately assisting with the successful transition, renovation and assimilation, but this has not always been the case, and many just exploited both innocent rural seller and nervous foreign buyer.
Embellishments, Shells, ribbon, string and a charm
creating a gorgeous backdrop to the colorful trees outside my windows.
I don't usually blog about the ups and downs of querying. Rejections are shared only with my wife and my good Scottish friend, Glen Livet. But now I have increasing confidence in the fact that four industry veterans see some promise in my story. I am trying to settle in to that period of waiting (and trying not to check my e-mail every four seconds.) Now that the manuscript's in a queue on someone's e-reader there's really not much else I can do except focus on my WIP, which is about 2/3s complete. It's all very strange and discombobulating.
But if you're like me, and like the gooey, warm, fudgy stuff, you have GOT to try this.
The line between the part that is well nourished (pink) and the part that is not well nourished (blue, which is probably due to narrowing of the small arteries because of plaque) causes the event.
It is, after all, a muscle ♥
8 eggs, separated
I saw the big ending surprise coming…but not that last gift from Liam, and not the third act twist with the old lady. Look for all of Higgin’s hallmarks, the animal love, the fun and unusual jobs, the dysfunctional family love, friendship with the elderly, and a girl who is realistically enjoyable.
Buddha explained that consciousness arises out of conditions. There is no arising of consciousness without conditions Consciousness is named according to whatever condition through which it arises.
Now, I understand when you have a lot of pride in your faith and you want the whole world to share your feelings. It’s like eating the most fabulous cheesecake – you must tell all of your friends at once so they may enjoy the same pleasures! But when does it get to the point where you start preaching, pushing and forcefully encouraging people to join you. When does it get to the point that a normally shy person will approach a stranger with his own beliefs or enter a conversation to speak about his own beliefs? And I’d like to know when it gets to the point where a person becomes so ensconced in their Lord and their religion that he begins to feel God-like himself and takes on the task of judging others who do not believe.
Roarke joined me while I was creaming the butter and sugar and “helped” me sieve the flour… I put it in the sieve and he poured it straight into the bowl!
Was this all a part of his destiny to win the Money in the Bank briefcase?
hundred year undefeated army of death’ never thought they’d see the
I am a third degree reiki master
He made himself big against the Brazilian that reminds me of T-Pain and he also saved the RooThug’s audacious chip. He also hired his pet sea gull to poop on the RooThug’s jersey when we had conceded that penalty.
Next week we will be better though when the new members are here!
After the show, we went to thank his manager for getting us in, and he invited us to come play Texas Hold-Em (poker) back at Eddie's suite, after dinner. (They had a dinner with their promoter's company.) We would meet back with them in a few hours.
This one is not quite 4" tall. :o)
5. Reading - I have so many books sitting at my bedside, just waiting for me to pick it up. I just... don't. On top of all the things I over-commit myself to, I have joined a book club. This means I HAVE to make time to read. But it also means that this book is the priority, whether or not it would be something I would choose to read on any other given day. At least I have something in my life for this one thing pushing me to "do"!
Well, I could not agree more, with this gorgeous selection of Royal Wedding inspired treats, all that is needed is a rather nice cup of tea.
Grooveline Horns
Well so far we have been spared any further storm activity, here's hoping it stays that way!!
2:00 Full Service
the available time of course I said YES!!!!
Bailey Cates writes the Magical Bakery Mysteries. The first in the series, Brownies and Broomsticks, releases today in mass market paperback and ebook formats from NAL/Penguin. She also writes the Home Crafting Mystery Series as Cricket McRae. The sixth in that series, Deadly Row to Hoe, will release in November from Midnight Ink/Llewellyn. There's a giveaway, so be sure to leave a comment. And check back this weekend to see if you won.
I can't say it's a happy Tuesday....lol....not when I'm on the road today and away from my family tonight :(
Thank you all for participating in the survey on blog swag for writers and supporting last week's post on February's debut!
Said Ziggy, dragging deep on his cigarette.
“Rappers only get considered great after they die,” Ted added. “What about that? What about Biggie?”
My giveaway to win the fantastic prize to win a book bundle of all three of Ciara Geraghty's books ended on Tuesday. I was astounded by the number of enteries, and want to thank everyone so much for their support. I have now picked a winner a random.
Spent a lot of my time just kinda chilling with my kid too, we really got to reconnect and just hang out, playing Rock Band till 3 am, being loud and silly, eating junk food, and laughing till it hurt. It was pretty good. And crisis aside, it was a good month... I think a hiatus of sorts is needed every once in awhile. I've kinda swore off of the etsy chat thing too. I was finding myself just going in almost like morning coffee and a cig... like a habit, but not even an enjoyable one anymore. A lot of women hate me in there... they seem to feel a need to bash me or talk shit or whatever. It kinda cracks me up how people who no nothing about you can make a call on the type of person you are by a shop and a name... those are the people I have no time for. I have met some very very cool people in chat, well ya'll are on my blog list so there... nerr. But the rest... they are too dull, automatic, and judgemental for me. I just can't be bothered with it anymore. For the most part the people in chat don't buy from me, don't like me, have nothing interesting to say so why torture myself... I'll talk to you fine people here who actually give a shit.
We plan on a family afternoon tea on Sunday.
An endangered species. We know where they are (crossing King Road), we know when they are most at risk (at night), and yet a "voluntary closure"of the threat is the best we can do?
At the centre of the town (for, despite its relatively diminutive size, Winchelsea regards itself not as a village but makes a claim to be the smallest town in England) is the church of St Thomas the Martyr. Quite substantial for a settlement of this size, the present-day church only hints at what was originally constructed. Ruined transept columns to the west of the porch suggest that a much larger church may have existed (whether construction was ever completed was the subject of speculation for many years but it is now generally accepted that the church once extended westwards), but successive brutal and murderous raids by the French in the 14th century destroyed much of what had only recently been built.
Sauce, Slow Cooked
“No Christian Audigier or Ed Hardy, which are forever banned from fashionable workplaces everywhere.”
Gung Fu has freed me. Finally.
The heavier than average malt gives it a smell of a darker type of bread and it has a good grassy hops smell as well. If it tasted as good as it smelled, it would be a beer to look for again. But, of course, anything run through BBC (or more likely, one of their macro contract brewers), puts up a false pretense. It has an odd twang that shouldn't be here, and the grassy bitterness that starts out fairly strong disappears in a flash. You're then left with a cardboard type of bitterness that's indistinct and honestly just not where it should be for a DIPA.
In my mind I saw the stream winding down these mountains, leaving Yugiri, to be pulled into a river. I saw the prayers steam off the water in the morning sun as the river flowed through the rainforest, past a tiger and a mouse-deer drinking from it, past Malay kampongs and aboriginal longhouses and Chinese squatter settlements. I saw a farmer in his paddy field by the river's edge uncrook his back and gaze upwards to the sky, feeling a cool breeze on his face and a long moment of unexplained contentment.
Is your neighbour a terrorist? Does he behave suspiciously and meet strange people? Does he buy copious quantities of sugar, weedkiller, plastic explosive, apple pips or unknown substances? Does he look at things as if he wants to blow them up? Is he getting ready to nuke your children? If we work together we can defeat terror. Call 0898 STOPTURR for the information hotline and do your bit for society. All calls will be treated with strict confidence. Rewards.
Oh, one more little thing about the walk... Tucker has complained that riding his Razor scooter that far makes him tired. He needs a lot of breaks, and he usually gives me some lip when I tell him that it's a Walking Day (maybe 3 times a week). I don't think he's being defiant, I think that his 6:00 a.m. bowl of Cheerios isn't sticking with him. I don't love the idea (yet) of getting up extra early to make a big breakfast, so I had the idea of boiling some eggs tonight. I'll peel them and put them in a Tucker-accessable dish in the fridge so he can help himself to an egg or two, in addition to his cereal. I can't decide if this is genius or lazy. Might be both.
We are also selling raffle tickets for $5 per ticket or 5 tickets for $20 for a chance to win a 40" HDTV. Leave me a comment if you'd like to purchase tickets - you do not need to be present to win, and I'm happy to mail tickets to you if you aren't in my local area.
Equity Release, Reverse Mortgage
While you are cooking your meat you can be placing your first layer of burrito shells into the bottom of the pan. I put one in the bottom then I cut the other into fourth and placed them in corner side out filling up all of the open space. Like so:
1) I don’t dispute these numbers. But if you think “Farm Manager” is the only career opportunity for a person with an Ag degree, you don’t understand Ag… which may be the problem here. And according to Michelle Singletary’s recent Washington Post editorial, and another from the NYT, Ag is currently one of the degrees with the lowest unemployment rate in the US. But I am not going to discuss that further… now… I don’t think…
So many of my friends have a carload of children. Going to the movies these days is costly, nothing like how it used to be. Dinner and a movie is not even a cheap date now, it all adds up. Did you know it does not have to be a fortune anymore for you and your family to enjoy a movie???
I'd say he hit the bong,
P.S. To spruce up your Book Promotion and Marketing Skills, read this amazing post by Carolyn Howard Johnson on my dear friend, Stephen Tremp's blog.
What are the former Merry-Go-Round members up to nowadays?
To those experiencing that chaos, I wish you good luck, and I really do hope things get better for you. But its your choice whether you want chaos over genuine happiness.
Madison is kissing up some more.
They longed to draw the night sky near
I was being referred to the clinic for a previously diagnosed auto-immune disorder called Anti-phospholipid Antibody Syndrome (which may or may not currently be active) and Anemia, but most of the people there were waiting for a 4 hour long chemo treatment. I picked up a magazine for some distraction and happened to pick up one that was covering a young lady's addiction to plastic surgery. I read for a little bit and then looked up to see a man enter the clinic who was so white he almost looked transparent. The man's cap covered his bald head, he wore grey sweats and looked to be in his 50s. I didn't see a wedding ring as he carefully placed his fragile self in the chair across from mine and I suddenly felt lonely for him. I glanced down at the young beautiful face in the magazine marked up for all the "nipping and tucking" she wanted done on her already "perfect" face and became sick to my stomach. Oh, the vanity of life. I was guilty- I hate my nose...does it really stinkin' matter???? I was disgusted with both the girl in the glossy print and myself. I put the magazine down, not having the stomach for it after seeing these people, they are living a reality far different from mine. They don't care what they look like physically, they just want to LIVE, to be HEALTHY, and have a day that's not consumed with thoughts of how to stay alive.
Urgency brought me to San Francisco and it has carried me up until the end of last year. To be clear, I do not associate having a family, children, and a good means of income with a representation of complacency – those aspects of life just seem to be a different set of goals that other people (not named me) were working on.
There is indeed no power greater than the power of language, the medium that binds speakers of distinct languages together. So powerful and, perhaps, so fearful was the power of the word that when God said “Let there be light,” the word created “light.” Does anyone suppose that when God said “Let there be light” there would be no light? Of course ordinary mortals today would hardly expect light to be
We've never had a greenhouse before - not a proper one made of glass. J made one at the old house, and one at the allotment, from pieces of scrap wood and some polythene sheeting which was being thrown away by some builders at work.
So is the legacy of Phantasm one in which imagination is the greatest fear-inducer of them all? Maybe so, and that's probably the best thing - seeing as how there are so many treasures to be had in this film that to tell them all. This is one treasure for all horror fans to seek out themselves.
Dissent
Why is Blogger's spell check givin me the stinkeye over "internet's"?? And "stinkeye"?
Now I'll be the first to admit that my loose style gets me into trouble sometimes. As I get older I have a hell of a time remembering where we left off. I always have great intentions of taking notes and most sessions my notes of the beginning are great, but the farther I get into the game I find I get wrapped up in what's going on and forget to note things. Luckily I have players that are more organized than me and can usually tell me where we last left off.
Sang-Hun works as a low-level gangster collecting money for his longtime loan shark friend. Sang-Hun seethes with rage due to his troubled childhood and abusive father. At any moment, Sang-Hun can lash out at relatives, friends & strangers with the only way he knows how to solve problems – savage violence. One day, Sang-Hun walks along a residential road and spits on the sidewalk. He unintentionally hits a brash young high school student named Yeon-Hee. When Yeon-Hee tells Sang-Hun to clean up his mess, he knocks her out with a punch to the face. Sang-Hun then sits across from her until she regains consciousness. He offers to buy the girl a beer and the beginnings of an unusual friendship occurs……
And what about painting? Well I have been busy, two clocks and a commission have been completed, and I will show you those soon. But for now a couple of pieces I have made for the sake of painting.
This is a very interesting thing to see, as this will ultimately take tattoos into a greater realm of overall acceptance, as it penetrates people’s conditioned beliefs about them, but it is my goal to help support a conscious revolution of sacred tattoos that can help benefit more than the aesthetic eye on a collective level. I just think it’s super cool to see things shifting as that is the first step to opening the gateway to unlimited treasures that will then be revealed upon stepping in.
Starting with the album "Miles", and going through "Relaxin'", "Workin'", "Steamin'", and "Cookin'", is where Miles Davis really begins to show what a great musician he had become. All these albums have many fine tracks, and all should definitely be in any library of fine jazz. These albums have Davis' first outstanding band-Coltrane, Garland, Chambers, and Jones, along with Davis' fine, individual, warm horn playing. These albums were recorded in several long sessions, and the cohesiveness of the band is very apparent. Of all the Prestige recordings, these last few albums are the finest, and are some of the finest jazz in the history of the genre.
Height: 505
Ping-An’s forces fight for survival under the relentless onslaught of the Pacification Fleet- the last line of defence for the inhabitants of the helpless Hannah’s World.
“He died on Sunday night at 6 Oclock in a most glorious manner. He said He was going to that Country he had all His life wished to see and expressed Himself Happy, hoping for Salvation through Jesus Christ – Just before he died His Countenance became fair. His eyes Brighten’d and He burst out Singing of the things he saw in Heaven.”
Add dry ingredients to wet ingredients and stir gently, just until combined. Fold in blueberries.
Davis made his remarks during a private lunch with former colleagues from Tate & Lyle at the Boot & Flogger wine bar in Southwark on Thursday.
My kidadults are well on their way now. No longer littles or middles, they are forging ahead into adulthood. They are making their way into this great thing we call life. They are falling in love, graduating from college (and high school - my youngest little)... they are creating their own lives.
Gary Austin, BP America’s regional regulatory adviser, and CSR restoration ecologist Steve Paulson, who have worked together on gasfield reclamation in western Wyoming for several years, initiated the project. They met with Steve Williams, a professor in the Department of Renewable Resources, who works with the WRRC, and Stahl, Wolff and Curran.
Sadly, Petrino’s crash-and-burn is only the latest in a series of moral breakdowns occurring in college football. Several other prominent programs have suffered leadership failings over the past three years.
You may feel a bit caught out of the blue, and upon the beginning disclosures we can feel already that many of you will be evaluating and re-evaluating your own previous stances on how long these changes have taken to happen.
Readers might like the following argument:
Teaching art gets a bad rap, in my opinion. Some look at it as a default job because you just couldn't get your REAL art jib started, or it's just a way to pay bills. Teaching is very rewarding. Most of us have devoted outpr lives to learning how to draw, paint,and sculpt why should thatknowledgejust die with us? It shouldn't. We have a responsibility to impart what we've learned to other generations so that they might expand and grow, and one day teach others. In a way, by teaching, no matter what the age group or setting, we're putting pieces of our selves into others ane insuring in a small way, that we will live forever.
Put the sauce in the jars, screw on the lids and let the jars cool off standing upside down.
09/12/2011 BUY 0.02 audcad 1.02912
Thanks also to our wonderful sponsors Dis digis and Delicious doodles for their very generous sponsorship last wk.
I loved taking Ellie for her first haircut last night. It was fun to hear her telling everyone that she got a "princess haircut." Before I had a little girl, I was convinced that I would never talk about princesses, and I was wrong.
It's been ages since I've done a big proper cake so I couldn't wait to get stuck in. The cake itself is a two tiered vanilla and chocolate sponge cake with chocolate buttercream. She loves chocolate so it was the only choice really.
I’m a fan of the zombie sub-genre of horror films. It’s taken me awhile to figure out precisely why, though. The simple reason is that zombie movies are just about the only form of supernatural horror that has the potential to scare the monkey shit out of me. Ghosts, vampires, and demons don’t have that potential, but zombies? Yeah, I admit it. They scare me. Because of this, there is a certain level of respect I have for zombie movies, and the really great ones rank high on my list. If I really want to get pedantic here, I could complain that these are actually movies about ghouls, but that would just be confusing. There should be no surprise at this point that I’m talking about Night of the Living Dead and its eventual sequel, Dawn of the Dead.
While the community crafted the exterior, Local Motors designed or selected the chassis, engine, and transmission thanks to relationships with companies like Penske Automotive Group, which helped the firm source everything from dashboard dials to the new BMW clean diesel engine the Rally Fighter will use. This combination — have the pros handle the elements that are critical to performance, safety, and manufacturability while the community designs the parts that give the car its shape and style — allows crowdsourcing to work even for a product whose use has life-and-death implications.
ADD in vanilla and 1 egg.
A lady was seated at a table next to the hearth and beyond her there was a woman, holding a baby on her lap. The baby was playing and cooing in the content carefree way that childhood only still retains.
The threat to our nation, to our Constitution, is not from enemies foreign – the threat is from enemies DOMESTIC. Elected politicians who whore for the bankers and corporate elites – they are the real threat to our way of life. They are the ones who want to take our freedoms. These are the real enemy of the state, not some guy living in a cave in Pakistan.
Yeah, I did.
And won't you go and check out what the other DT members have created? They have outdone themselves this week! Happy stamping!!! :)
Being biracial can leave you torn between two worlds, if you’re close to one parent and not the other. All of my life, my sister and I have only known my mom’s Ukrainian side of the family. We weren’t close with our African American father, and thus we only possess very minimal memories of time spent with his side. Beyond vague images of me jumping onto the back of my cousin April and demanding piggy back rides (I was that young), I don’t remember anything about them from back in the day.
It's offering $1 million for Sheriff Joe Arpaio's head and $10,000 for anyone who wants to join the Mexican cartel.
Among Loire valley wines is a Vouvray Haut Lieu Huet (1919) while the Burgundy region includes a Puligny Montrachet Referts Sauzet (1992) and Vosne Romanée Jayer (1988).
The shift has to do with politics and religion become one in the same. And I believe it is happening here as well. From greater and greater restrictions and intrusive procedures regarding abortion, and ever-increasing funding cuts for women’s other health care issues including birth control, to the inequality in pay that still exists for women today and the degrading verbal vomit from some talk show hosts, women and women’s rights are under attack.
26’41 If u Scared, Say U Scared (Interlude)
We hope that you will enjoy our slightly different colour challenge.
I haven’t had the guts to go into the poop sewers- the smell alone is unbearable. Thousands of pounds of concrete laid on top of a running river of feces…. all to protect the city from that terrible stench of their own excrement. True, there are people who do like to investigate those sewers- either sewage workers or urban explorers like me, except not like me, because I hate the term “urban explorers.”
Mirkova E, Zaikov C, et al. Prenatal toxicity of xylene. J Hyg Epi Micro and Immun 1983; 27: 337-343.
This is a “silent dinner,” one of many extracurricular events American Sign Language students attend for additional practice. Their instructor Sara Bianco, who is deaf, said these events give students a taste of deaf culture.
Whispering trees
I’m not sure why I didn’t realize this when I was younger and try to have a secret boyfriend without my parent’s permission or going on dates with boys while I was still “talking to” my high school sweetheart. I always got caught. Everyone always gets caught. I think at this point I have to chalk it up to the Southern sense of family, even if you’re not, that magically makes it everyone else’s responsibility to report back on sightings of this person or that couple.
3 impossible
Some have become psychological wrecks, while others have contracted sicknesses such as epileptic fits.
"The SOP is an enterprise-architected multi-tenant environment..." Now this one's got me a little worried. You see, I grew up in multi-tenant environment in New York City. We called it a project. And I got my ass kicked fairly regularly in my multi-tenant environment.
If you are searching the Internet and intend on buying shoes from this brand then you can choose to go for Dayton. It is a wing tip dress shoes that comes in crocodile print leather. It comes with smooth kidskin leather uppers and has a non-leather sole. It is available in a multiple of colour combination. The pair is available in different sizes from which you can easily take your pick. This pair you can choose to wear at any party or event depending upon your clothes.
Another thing I liked about being on the farm was seeing the animals. Not just the farm animals, but the wildlife. I’ve developed a familiarity with game – I’ve had to, as it’s emblazoned on everything in the shop where I work, from jumpers and cufflinks to crockery and boxer shorts. Partridges on side plates and bowls, woodcock on mugs, pins and brooches of roe deer and snipe, pheasants embroidered onto jumpers and grouse woven into silk ties. I’ve been presented with a brace of pheasants, a few rabbits, pigeon and even haunches of venison as gifts, and I even have a tiny silver grouse hanging off my charm bracelet as a gift from my mother. But I’ve not yet actually spent any length of time around the live birds. Seeing them around the farm provided not only a novelty, but immense amusement.
I know: you can’t predict your future, you must create it.
My waist is tiny.
Its all enough to make my head hurt though I am pretty sure it will be worth it when I combine it with my improvisation skills.
no subject)
I’ve had to include the Issuu PDF files in another way – they’re now an image link to the Issuu site, where it can be viewed in a similar way as when the code was embedded. The problem, as I’ve outlined in previous posts, is that the embed code doesn’t validate – the Issuu employees on recent Issuu support forums say as much and that people have to live with it for the time being, which is pretty disappointing.
We didn't want to leave the happy little town, but the Kinderhotel beckoned. We got back in the car where Coco promptly threw up on herself. I tried to get most of it in an Air France barf bag, but she kept batting the bag away like, "Oooh, I'm so darn mad at that bag."
Okay, maybe not that bad, but what they had on was pretty short. I have to admit, I felt extremely old as I started to make fun of these girls to my co-worker. Although, I never would have worn something like that when I was their age.
While lovers make love in warm beds,
Heat refried beans.
-aniko
Bonus pick of a gal getting filthy in the mash tun!
The house in this movie is the kind I would love to have with the old wood floors, high ceilings, and wavy glass windows and doors. Even Mr. Savvy whispered to me and said you like this house don't you? He knows me too well.
For instance, I make use of the phrase “in any event” far, far too often. I’ve been called out for that many times, with some people sarcastically asking me “what if there’s no event?”
” I wish I had spent more time on the internet.”
Fun fact: Maturin was Oscar Wilde's great-uncle by marriage. Now you know.
The TARDIS doors open while the ship is still in flight by accident. Although they have arrived back on Earth in the 1960s, a time they have been trying to return to since they all met, the travellers soon realise that something is very wrong.
Lets see now:
Shirt: Ann Taylor
Then, all at once, through all the music, through all the sensible sounds of men building, attempting, comes the Dies Irae.
... and universes shred by conflict gurgle happily.
10. Use a mop or a wet suction machine to pick up the slurry. Always work from dry to wet in manageable sections without over-stretching. If necessary, repeat the procedure until all the polish film is removed. Alternatively, move onto your next section of floor and repeat the operation.
We're so lucky to live within walking distance to a marionette theatre. It's such a simple, classic, and charming form of entertainment that I hope never dies away. It's also one of the cheapest things to do in the city, so this is the third time we've gone! Tickets are only $8/adult and $5/children under 12. The theatre is located within the charming Swedish Cottage in one of my favorite parts of Central Park. After seeing a show, I love walking through the Shakespeare Gardens and then up to Belvedere Castle.
The zones are created for entrepreneurial companies to grow therefore furthering the focus on boosting the amount of money available to startups and making the area a hub for nanotechnology research and commercialization.
They’re going to be everywhere in 2012. American Vogue devotes six pages in the January issue to them, with the injunction “Dare to Flare”. But thanks to the Jil Sander collection of peplums that looked as though they’d been inflated with a pump, they were already the sleeper hit of 2011, although not all looked as modern as the Sander one.
It was the last tournament of the season for me.
Teppan Shoujo Akane
I am looking for an agent that likes fantasy/mythology with a twist. My debut novel, THE DESMONA CHILD, is a 106,000 word work of YA/Fantasy that leads up to the fall of Atlantis.
So tell me, seasoned van people: Are we on the right track here? It's an adjustment to our thinking that we can't just go where we want to, when we want to, and we have to plan everything out. Our lives are definitely headed in that direction, and that's ok, but what happens when life gets in the way and you can't plan everything out - what do you do?
Sogo is such a heaven~ There were soooo many Japanese Gyaru brands there as well like Spiral Girl, Glad News etc~~~ *Goes crazy*
“I Do Me” feat. Busta Rhymes
From an early biography of Greeley: "Were Greeley and Co. making their fortune meanwhile? Far from it. To edit a paper well is one thing; to make it pay as a business is another."
This weekend we had a small casual gathering with friends at our place. I really wanted to keep it simple, without too much cooking and cleaning afterwards. So I came up with a simple finger foods menu.
On the plus side Star Sapphire is depicted as having more fabric in her outfit than the comic book version but that probably has more to do with the standards and practices of a video meant for a somewhat younger audience.
Faithful to a time of meditation and prayer each day has not slowed things down. It is a time of sweetness and I love the stillness of the morning, but I get up from that chair with the intention of wrapping my arms around the incessant and demanding tasks of the day. And I know that I am not alone. I know people with children whose schedules are so demanding that even in a world of so-called convenience, it takes more to raise a child today than it did in my grandmothers time.
6oz softened butter
Sleeping Beauty
On the corner the grass is covered in yellow dandelions. I see them going to seed and hundreds of airborn weeds head my way. I turn to my six-year-old son and with an exasperated gesture, exclaim, “Look at that!”
About three weeks ago, right before going to the beach for a week on that spontaneous trip to Isle of Palm, S.C. to be with fellow unschoolers, I was quickly checking out some of my favorite blogs, seeking joy in places other than my long packing and cooking to-do list. On that day, I visited Sara, at Wandercraft, a crafty, dog-loving, great photographer in Boston. She revealed a giveaway for a small travel scrapbook that she had made. The winner would need to scrap a few pages of this book and blog about it and was given a more than generous amount of time in which to do so. Well, you know where this is going. I won! I came home from the beach to find this beautiful book and several scrapping accessories waiting for me on my table. I was so excited. I put it in my art room (a room that has seen far more food and Bananagrams than art lately) and envisioned all of the possible trips that I could scrap about. And, as recovering from the beach, new lives and early deaths took over, I conveniently blocked out the request to have a few pages scrapped for Sara's etsy store by this week. eek!
you know the whole mutual friend thing who I am no longer friends with etc etc
The data shows the fastest growth in the past 20 years is among white women in their 20s with some college education but no four-year degree.
I don't know how busy I'll be, or even if I'll remember how to speak English with all the French classes I'll be taking. I've kept a pretty good schedule up till now, but I'll probably have to cut back with less posts. To make it up I'll probably make them longer, even thought I'll still be writing them as I come up with them.
It takes a while to mosey into the shower and make the bed.
Lots of events LOL
controversy that surrounded the show. I think as the episodes progressed and the storyline got tamer and tamer, the show lost its steam. If the writers continued the shock factor of the first episode then maybe there would have been hope at a full season. Now, I’m left with ten measly episodes with a finale that ended so abruptly. At least give us a culminating episode!
29. Kiss me if I’m wrong, but isn’t your name… ?
Signed and personalised bookplates to stick in your books.
His rank breath played an eerie game of hide and seek in the fog-laden shadows. The rising moon was full of bright promise—but the night, pregnant with unshed tears, obscured her beauty and dimmed her light. The swollen clouds—black and heavy—transformed the forest beyond the small cottage into a dark haven for those who contemplated evil deeds—concealing him as he watched and waited for his treasured moment to come....
a huge webbed crack in the mirror where
Returning to the lounge my friends guy had fallen asleep on the sofa and she was now bored of him and decided to go home. The guy I was with stayed and we discussed what to do about the sleeping bloke. I fetched a blanket to pop over him, thinking it best just to leave him there to sleep and my guy asked if I had another blanket so he could sleep on the other sofa. Boldly I said it was okay he didn’t have to sleep on the sofa. So we went up to my room…
The minority core of students who put in 95% or higher participation on the robotics team may be the ones responsible for the team's regional first place wins, I don't know.
William Hopkins, William Hawkins, William Harris, Zachariah Field, Samuel
Sonny Rollins Tenor Sax
as many of you know - i keep it REAL on here - i don't hold back and truth is the way to bliss - i never thought that blogging should be a fake facade to put on and so forth - so my last post was a "read all about it" "right in your face" kinda' post -- i have no deep dark secretes nor embarrassed about anything about myself or past - i find a lot of people hide behind their blogs or won't show "who" they are or give body shots, ect. -- live once and make it WORK - don't be afraid to let the truth be told and show who you truely are and not what you 'dream' to be .. just saying, one girls thoughts ...
Hebrews 4:15-16 (NLT)
This is a simple dessert with a fancy name, well, I think semifreddo sounds fancy anyways. I am all about the coconut these days so when I saw this lovely cool dessert in my Everyday Food magazine a few months ago I ripped it out immediately. Coconut, lime, and mango? Yes please!
The Progress Energy Foundation is putting half a million dollar investment in the Florida school system. The money will fund energy education classroom projects as well as workforce development at high school career academies throughout the state. The funds will support public-education foundations, science centers and career academies.
A couple of other notes: the event space, City Grit, was really neat. It’s an old schoolhouse, and although it’s been converted into a “culinary salon”, a lot of the old elements remain, including exposed beams, chalkboards, etc. Among other things, this means that the bathroom is down a hallway, and the facilities are, well, child-sized. And the bathroom is shared by the people at the adult-learning classes next door. Oh, and if you’re going to attend an event here, note that most of the tables are large tables of ten, so you’ll probably make some new friends. Only in New York!
Bird Sculpture "Trio in Harmony" hanging next to a line of Inspiration Banners all created from hand dyed textiles and sold separately or as a group, represent some of Elizabeth's latest work to be hung in the gallery. These unique, hand stitched, small banners would make excellent gifts for new graduates and as Mother's Day gifts.
In the lectures he gave that followed, the anti-frog brigade dropped out.
Of the 630 4 year cohort participants of the Hillside Work Scholarship Connection, only 210 received scholarships.
...and her cute room! i love the artwork over the bed, which reminds me of a yellow/white grouping of paintings that are sold at pieces, here in atlanta. very cool. and how cute is her dog on his matching bed?
I just love joining in over at the Basic Grey blog as I have a huge surplus of BG products!!!! Its great to be able to use them up and be inspired at the same time.
I thought it sounded silly at first. But I thought that about the Snuggie when it first came out, too, and I'll be damned if I'm not proudly sporting one right now.
Our drive to Minnesota, for last month's appointment at the Mayo Clinic, was much like that old saying about the postal service: through rain, sleet, hail and snow.
The dangerous part of this is when I start to feel content with the dirt and gravel that this world has to offer, instead of holding out for the rainbow that God wants to give me. He is a good God and He only wants good things for His children. It’s me that gets me in trouble.
This is not to excuse Doctor Lyre from taking his share of the blame for these pupil strikes.
The government promised the court that it would bulldoze the homes by May because they were built on land classified as private Palestinian property. Is it? If the land was ever bought, then it's Jewish-owned land, and it speaks about this below:
She held signs that read, “Reagan sucks,” and, “I’ll vote after the revolution.”
Stan Lee created the soap opera superhero comic where characters evolved and storylines continued from one issue to another and characters occupied a shared universe. The fact that he wrote so many books led to a greater reliance on the storytelling skills of the artists. Stan Lee would recount a basic plot to his collaborators who would then draw the entire issue from his outline and Stan would return to add dialogue to match the pictures.
Chief: 'Governor?'
The Goal: Reinhardt says that the main goal is to get more good and unique beer in the Kansas City area while connecting with those who are drinking it. Accessibility, he feels, is key; being open to talking brainstorming and listening to beer drinkers' ideas of what other brews could be on the horizon. "We really do want the folks of KC to have a say over some aspects of our brewing identity," he notes.
Nuclear Security and Safety as
- Mustard seeds - 1 tsp
But it also means that there appears to have on the side of evil and corruption continue to do what is revealed goodness itself as a supporter Bersih worse, though perhaps the most inclined of those violent provocation is in deep sleep and conditioner in a swoon, but wait , replaced the sobering events of the 28th April, my thoughts, which may lead to the face not abandoned us in a state of despair, best and worst of human nature – is both, but make a strong argument for the need for democracy in Malaysia This is to remind you that the struggle for democracy is not only at national level to combat corruption and injustice – that inside we do every day what is right morally and therefore for all those who were in peace and courage to literally throw the first stone, and seek out the other cheek, in a figurative sense, blessed to work for peace. And no less, we are not just spectators, but the means, the true cause of democracy in Malaysia.
Marg at The Adventures of an Intrepid Reader is hosting this one. Her challenge is "to write a post sharing some of the sites from your books, or some facts about the place where your books are set." In Sophomore Switch, party girl Tasha gets to spend a semester abroad at staid Oxford University in Britain, while studious Emily leaves Oxford for Tasha's UC Santa Barbara in California. Here are photos of the two schools, neither of which I've ever seen. Do you think you could guess which is which?
So like I said on my previous post that included this movie, I tried to tell myself beforehand that I just had to see it, as I am a card-carrying horror movie fan and this horror movie (and its predecessor) had been relatively big news upon its release. But who am I kidding? I couldn't wait to see The Human Centipede 2! When the first movie was pretty lame and didn't give us near the graphic-ness that was promised, how could I pass up a movie that was claiming to be so much more gross and disgusting?
"Yeah, well yeah...but I like to be in control to!"
I've tried quizzes. Pictionary marathons. Class parties. Fun games.
It was a pleasant day and our prosaic still-life was more inspirational than it may have seemed at first glance.
Maria stumbled just a bit in the middle when they were dancing separately and it caused her to get off in the choreography just a bit. When they were hold, though, she was stunning and they were perfect. And I loved her dress! She looked like a flowy mirror ball!
I bought this sarong from the Cancer Research shop a few weeks ago with the idea of turning it into something for the Lattes. The pattern was an easy choice - though I love sewing when I get started, my impetus to start usually comes from frugality rather than desire - so I went for the free oliver + s downloadable pattern for a popover sundress.
It also makes me think of Paul’s race.
Originally, I was going to be away from home until 10:30, at which point my parents wouldn’t really want me sending an email. I was going to a different church’s youth group. After walking out of that room and coming to that realization, though, I knew there was no way on earth that would happen. I really can’t explain that finalization of thought. Going home early to tell Em I was there for her and I would love her no matter what wasn’t just one option on my list. I had to. That conviction was from the Holy Spirit and I knew it. It felt so strong, so compelling. It was a desire I couldn’t even fight.
and even 10 months on your words still affect my actions and my thoughts.
I embossed one of the larger doily images onto vellum, die cut and added the sentiment, "Wishing You Happiness" (from Old Friends). All of this is layered onto one of my favorite paper collections ever by Karen Russell. Although she hasn't been designing lines lately, her Narratives line for awhile, this line is a classic (especially the black and cream, which is what I used here). I adore all of Karen's designs and was thrilled to see this come out in 6x6 size!
An overworked, elderly fan pulsated above my head, murmuring tones of disappointment and sorrow. It had seen too much too dark, in its time. Too much altogether. It knew my fate, but there was nothing it could do. It knew that no amount of after-sun would spare my blistered entirety.
LOUIS:
Of hope within reach of you, it’ll forever stay…
No on to the food. They’re famous for their fried dough pizza. It’s called the Montara. It’s lightly fried then baked with marinara sauce, mozzerella and basil. It was an interesting choice. Yes, it’s different, but I’m still trying to figure out how I feel about it. Imagine fried dough (or a zeppoli) without the powdered sugar and cinnamon, just plain. Then add marinara sauce and mozzerella cheese. I guess you can relate it to savory crepes. To me crepes should always have fruit. I know people keep telling me it’s different, but a pancake should never have ham and spinach in the middle (i don’t even eat ham). So it was edible, not amazing, not bad, just different.
the walls are speaking well of you,
living room
Dash will yank me down to his level, give me a rosemary-scented kiss, and whisper. "Mama, I've picked some herbs. Let's make some salad dressing. My recipe."
Team Blake is back with Jermaine singing “Open Arms”. I love this song and he’s doing great so far. I like the very simple beginning. He toned it down even more from the version I remember until the chorus… that’s when his voice really kicks in and knocks you out. Again- everyone is being so creative as far as changing up the arrangements to make it their own without making the songs unrecognizable.
Give us some examples of free or justice……….
U.S.D.A.’s CSREES has been actively promoting animal cloning and biotechnology. (It’s ironic that the U.S.D.A. also has the National Invasive Species Information Center.)
86. The strongest muscle in the body is the tongue.
I want to challenge myself and you to think upon the things that God has done in our lives. Will you remember what God has done and praise Him for it? Will you allow yourself to have a heart of gratitude for our great Saviour? Maybe you haven’t been delivered from the power of sin, maybe you aren’t saved. If you aren’t saved then you can’t rejoice in the fact of what God can do. You need to turn to God, Believe that Jesus died to pay for all your sin, believe he arose again, trust Him as your saviour. Then you can truly rejoice in being delivered.
LB: Gretchen is a wunderkind, and though she invested heavily and early in the promotion of her book, Gretchen’s success was largely due to her own investment: the time she took, daily, to connect with fans at the grassroots level. “Grassroots” is a word I use a lot in my business—it demonstrates that organic buzz which inspires WOM – encompassing both the potential of engaging fans online as well as offline. Gretchen created “super fans,” those fangelist readers of her blog who, so excited about the book’s release, would physically activate her message in their own local communities. Whether you have a minimal or exponential blog readership, an author needs to know their blog readers, and everything about them that they’re willing to comfortably give away (hey, Facebook does it and no one’s complaining!) If readers feel they belong to a greater message that self-empowers them, a “movement” even, you’re engaging what I think of as cause marketing. I try to keep cause marketing at the heart of all relevant book campaigns.
Thanks to you, for free, in a nice seat
When a male uses this trope feel free to simply cut and paste the following paragraph in reply:
and your joy might be complete.
(I admit, My amazing Prince is the one that tackles that stack...I can calculate, but it's definitely not something I do quickly, & I feel like I have to triple-check everything!);
Sec. 1022, the bill’s mandatory detention provision, requires the President to detain members of al-Qaeda who have planned or carried out attacks against the U.S. or its coalition partners. Only sec. 1022 states that it “does not extend to citizens of the United States.”
I used a PTI glassine bag, American Crafts cardstock (12x12), PTI stamps (BB:Chevron Stripes, Wonderful Words Additions) & dies (tag sale #5, super star border). The patterned paper and decorative brads are My Mind's Eye and the chipboard letters are Studio Calico. The text patterned paper is Echo Park.
Whether or not the 'deal' is worth it or not is a question we'll have to postpone, because they're not protecting our welfare, health, peace, and morals, or at least not significantly better than non-Control states do. How do I know this? The PLCB told me.
The GrandMothers were formed in August of 2002, when four legendary former members of Frank Zappa's The Mothers of Invention, Napoleon Murphy Estrada, Bunk Gardner, and Don Preston were invited to perform the music of Frank Zappa in Leipzig, Germany. It would be the first time that these esteemed Mothers of Invention alumni would be getting together to rehearse and perform classic Frank Zappa material.
A few parsley leaves
I know most of the people who made these comments and the like really only intended nothing malicious. They're just curious, and that is totally natural. But, I will never forget the woman in the checkout line at aisle #7 at Wally World who stared at the brood as we waited nicely behind she and her husband while they checked out. When I couldn't take the staring and nervous edging further and further away from us, I exclaimed something like, " Aren't I just the luckiest Momma ever!?" That sure shut her up. With hubby starting workups this month that will continue until he deploys a year from now, I'm sure looking forward to doing my shopping/eating/playing here on base. Those comments, at least the clueless ones will be few and far between because I'll be with my own people. People who get it. People who understand what I'm dealing with and will be happy to support me when I go a little crazysauce from all these darn kids I have!
These girls keep up their behavior to lose a scary amount of weight, putting themselves in great harm. Most likely, I believe, the main reason for doing such a thing is to be ‘beautiful’. That’s what most girls desire.
The hunt was on – how to fix what appeared to be a simple issue – just get the correct sized parts and all would be well and of course muck out the mini lake so one could see and get to all the places that required attention for fix’n. We hired a guy ( this is a phrase I suggest you move into your language carefully as it always ends in they didn’t finish the job, or we paid them because they were doing so well and then never showed up again Greenhorn alert ) to nimbly clean out the muck and overgrowth with his little track hoe crawler.
so we re-recorded 13 old songs for a new/old record called "Mr.
But she knew that if she wanted to move forward as a restaurant consultant and really support chefs, she would have to have a better understanding of how a chef works. So she enrolled in the Culinary Institute of America, as one does.
After a long, long time, many years of soul searching, study and self-discovery I believe I have finally 'got it' and now understand the difference between the deepest agony and misery of the human condition and the greatest joy!
I was sort of just going through the motions all week, feeling like my shin was in a sort of frustrating limbo between being fine while hiking but questionable while running. As has been the case several times over the last 13 months, a little bit of running seemed to be exactly what it needed to get over the hump, though, and now I'm hoping to just maintain this running volume (no increasing) for a good chunk of time as I start adding in some evening strictly hiking sessions. At this point, I really am grateful for any amount of running I am able to do pain-free, so I'll take it.
travel fashion. Off on Monday, returning Friday...I'll take it, anyway I can get it.
I honestly can’t understand why people bother to spend their energy making trans people feel they aren’t accepted. It’s all based on fear, I know, but I so wish they would direct that energy elsewhere. Trans people have more than their share of struggle, so church people more than anyone else should reach out and make them feel welcome. Please know that there are churches and individuals with strong faith who want you to know that God loves you, not just if you’re Trans but because you’re Trans. God knows exactly who you are and loves you for exactly who you are.
Vash the Stampede is the most infamous outlaw on the planet Gunsmoke and with a 60 billion double dollar price on his head the gun slinging pacifist can't seem to get away from money grabbing, itchy-trigger-finger citizenry.
In China, there are a lot of high end malls. Lots of name brands. You can find any and everything you need in China. Except for a shoe in a size 9.5. In the six years I have lived here, I have never been able to purchase a pair of shoes. It is really sad because, I love shoes. I mean, I really love shoes.
2. New Orleans Saints
I started off as a musician, playing in various bands starting in high-school, and even in the school string orchestra. Later, I started getting into more mainstream music. I was in a band with Dave Moffatt of the Moffatts for while. Happened to track each other down on MySpace (remember that?) and ended up writing some songs together and playing on ET Canada. I got into music that way, kind of a do-it-yourself manner taking on management duties out of necessity and by default. I realized that this music business thing is pretty cool, so I went to Durham College for Music Business Management and from there spent some time at SOCAN as an intern, which is one of the best choices I’ve made career wise! A lot of my friends were going to labels, and without seeming money-hungry, I tried to see where the money still was. At the time, it was in publishing/performing rights. While at Durham, I spent my time assisting with and organizing member events, such as the SOCAN awards, and took the opportunity to network as much as possible. At one of the Gemini nominee reception parties, I met Ron Proulx, Owner/President of Arpix Media, who managed a few of the composers nominated for Gemini awards that year. And then it was a little bit of a lapse before we connected again. Following SOCAN, I went on to work with Melissa Syme, who manages Holy Fuck, among others. I worked primarily in the tour management realm, but also was involved in other avenues such as online and film/television/ad placements. It was a really great job and a pleasure to work with talented acts such as Holy Fuck and Ruby Jean and the Thoughtful Bees. Ron Proulx then came back in the picture looking to add a team member and I took that opportunity to venture into Music Supervision – an area that I had never directly intended on getting into but am thankful I did.
to bully such redress.
Lesson Two: Don't touch strangers sitting next to you, cuz they flinch like you just lit them up with a case of ebola via transmission of your personal cooties.
I was on standby for months, for the entire next year. I recognized the aggression in "my boys" and the need for an adrenaline rush. I chided them after motorcycle accidents and roadhouse brawls. I preached a good sermon about constructive versus deconstructive behavior, baby.
Runner-up is Nick Roberts with the multi-layered Grief. Such an emotional journey - I haven't been able to get it out of my mind yet I confess I still don't quite understand it - and I really like that. Beautiful and tragic. Well done Nick.
The concerns are shared by the Platform campaign group, which has obtained copies of the original and amended contracts and on Sunday will publish them on its website.
Coronado Brewing Company Hoppy Daze IPA
Still, it will come as no surprise to regular readers of this blog that very little of this wealth of practical information receives much in the way of attention nowadays. Instead, the concept of wind power has been monopolized by a recently minted industry devoted to building, servicing, and promoting giant wind turbines that provide electricity to the grid. The giant turbines have their virtues, no question; compared to most other energy production technologies, certainly, they’re safe and clean, and their net energy yield is a respectable 8 or 9 to 1, which beats the stuffing out of most other alternative energy sources. Still, the idea that serried ranks of giant wind turbines will enable us all to keep on using energy at today’s extravagant rates runs headlong into at least two difficulties.
she always followed me came into
Pam Hornschu of The Pampered Stamper created this lovely altered pocket watch, which even opens! I love the vintage colors and the fabulous texture on the watch. The way Pam has tucked the Cheshire Cat into Alice's arm is so clever!
I was spilling over the top and oozing out the bottom of the pathetic, little bra – giving my breasts the appearance of an exploded tube of Pillsbury biscuit dough. Without the camouflage of my usual baggy attire, I could no longer hide nor deny their existence…. especially now that there was a witness.
John Kiriakou, who had previously revealed the CIA’s use of waterboarding of Al-Qaeda suspects, was charged in January with leaking secrets. The indictment allows the case to proceed to trial without an evidentiary hearing.
My kids came home from school and I did their homework with them as I cooked dinner. I made roasted chicken thighs, my husband's favorite, and mock succotash. I was out of corn, but I added bacon and cream, so no one noticed. We had a lovely dinner and then we put the kids to bed. Well, all except E. She needed to read a story for school and since my kids are required, by me, to read every night, she chose to do her school reading then.
The disadvantage PR is facing is the electorate is unwilling to cut PR some slack. Whenever PR is seen to be inefficient, the Malaysian voters are quick to find fault with PR and will revert to the thinking PR is not much different from BN. This is a fallacy as BN is not only seen to be corrupt but corrupted to the core.
But here, this moment pauses. Who wouldn’t pause with it before the inevitable moving on.
What about humans? Has human intelligence evolved? Are they more intelligent now than before? Do they consume more, or less power than the previous generations? Has the human ‘computational power efficiency’ improved?
I just peed my pants in a big girl store. The moral of the story is that I need to do more kegels.
I regularly write entries for this blog that do not see the light of day. I tend to over-think things sometimes, and I find that, in covering everything, my argument spreads out into a fine, thin film and my central points get lost. Or I put it off and then find that the rest of the world has moved on and everything than can be said, has been said. But this particular piece has been hanging fire for the better part of two weeks, and I need to get it out of the way so I can talk about other stuff. Because it tends to get into a subject I've already been talking about a lot - the nature of truth in threatre.
I just want to say THANKS.
And how about after the five year period? Chances are high, five years from now, that ebooks will be the dominant format. Do I want to be locked into a contract making 17.5% on every sale when I could have been making 70%?
The past few months have been so very busy. A new job for Geekydaddy has meant he is home past eight every might. Real school for Geekygirl is bringing homework, PTA and other obligations. Stressful changes at my work have been occupying my mind and my time.
The Pew survey adds to a wave of surveys and studies showing that GOP-sympathizers are better informed, more intellectually consistent, more open-minded, more empathetic and more receptive to criticism than their fellow Americans who support the Democratic Party.
Today marks the World Day of Pinhole Photography.
In this episode Mr Beansprout founded a cupcake on the ground. Because of the cold rainy weather Mr Beansprout is craving for fat and sweets.
Foucault, Michel. The History of Sexuality: Volume 1: An Introduction. Vintage Books. Random House: New York. 1978.
“I choose to err on the side of grace.” A seminary professor of mine said that once in class. He was not talking about driving. He was talking about interpreting the Bible.
We also see the story from Sonia’s friend Helen’s perspective - the Aunt with whom Jez was staying. There seem to have been some cracks in Helen’s relationship with her husband, and Jez’s disappearance exacerbates this, as well as a problem with alcohol. Of course calling on her friend, Sonia, to help doesn’t get her the support she needs!
120gm all purpose flour
I would wear everything you chose for me, my love,
C Jim Kerr
The Weirs have both had serious health conditions in recent years and have not been able to work. Colin, 64, had previously worked as a television cameraman and Chris, 55, is a fully-trained psychiatric nurse.
There was also a significant positive association between plasma vitamin D level and SCC risk after adjustment for the same confounders, with women in the top quartile for vitamin D having a 3.77-fold increased risk for SCC compared with those in the bottom quartile.
Incidentally, few people know that, before it was a paperback, GO ASK ALICE was a hardcover book. And even fewer have seen the original dustjacket, so we present it here for your edification:
Erica Morris
What she did is something indescribable. I read the "after post" so to speak, and the piece ABC did on it, and literally had tears in my eyes. (I'm a huge sap that way) I was wowed! And I was honored that I was able to participate, and I was amazed and thrilled that all these wonderful families were going to have a special Thanksgiving.
Me Made May 2012 outfit 7, Tuesday 15th May 2012 - Colette Patterns Sail Away Ceylon and Irregular Choice No Place Like Home heels, worn with a plastic anchor necklace which was a gift from Lauren
By the time we arrived home, it was almost dinner time. Considering I had not been home since breakfast, you can imagine what merry hell greeted me. Somehow, the kids were fed, the house was tidied, the washing was done, and some sense of order was restored. I was a blur of activity (amazing, really, considering the world of hurt I am in after two sessions of boot camp. Did I mention that? No? Ouch.)
“How about I just email you my sales leads?” Simon asks.
Last month, Professor Tilly published pioneering research showing that these stem cells exist in human ovaries and that they could be stimulated in the laboratory to grow into immature egg cells.
And this dead man the guards they all stood there in fright
For most it is a day to remember. And rightly we should remember the sacrifice our veteran’s have made which enables us to live in freedom and democracy.
How do you build your social media page? After you determine your social media focus, this will be fairly easy to do. When picking photos, remember to only use images you have legal rights to use. It’s best to use photos you’ve taken yourself.
Acts 8:26 – An angel spoke to the Apostle Philip.
10-1081 Raven
TV and movies can be valuable, but I think that we are neglecting a very important channel that we can use for these ongoing discussions and common experiences. That channel is books. The problem is that for us to really have a shared experience, we have to read what they are reading, or at the very least, ask them about what they are reading.
Kind of like the (incestuous!) love child between Blade Runner and Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind, Code 46 is about love in the time of being almost-post-human. The film pushes special PPCC buttons by also being post-colonial: it acknowledges the Rest of the World, and what its position would be in a freaky future. But best of all: it's just a sweet, heady, doomed romance full of brooding darkness and two very weird people.
Wooo hooo, I got the media chest instead of the tall one ! I can’t wait till they deliver.
2 length
Sorry, not sure where that one came from.
I cannot think of a man that I have dated that she did not have a serious problem with at first or by the end. Too short, weird, not talkative enough, poor grammar, does not make enough money, didn’t go to college, must be an alcoholic, not your type (how does she know MY type better than I do?)... the list goes on.
I know this has been unhealthy, so I resolve to be a nicer person even if it’s becoming too damn difficult. I will forgive, even if it will be very hard to forget.
I am big on making things from scratch. Cakes, frostings, pie fillings…etc, etc, etc. I feel there’s something to be said for taking butter and sugar and adding flour to make (insert baked good here). Like the old way. Like the way the grandma’s did it. Which brings us to today’s offering: homemade vanilla pudding.
I had never before heard an explanation for this, and later I asked him to repeat the definition for my own edification. He explained that the word is a compound of two other words, Oshi Shinobu. For those with an understanding of japanese and the martial arts (my own comes solely from manga and deciphering japanese terminology, so take my understanding with a grain of salt), the term Shinobu should seem familiar. It is a component of the term Nin (as in Ninja), and when applied to a person it becomes Shinobi (again, another term for Ninja). But I digress. Besides being an interesting linguistic diversion, what does this actually mean?
Bring me my Bow of burning gold:
This is what this show does so well – it makes these characters real. It makes them dimensional, believable people that you care about – you root for them, you pray that they don’t make bad decisions or get caught in circumstances beyond their control and when they do – you weep for them (at least my mom and I do. I don’t think there was one episode this season that didn’t make me cry like a baby at some point.) Yes I know that they are not real – but the fact that it seems like they could be is what makes this show so emotionally resonant.
she was very insistent.
After laying down the fundamental principles involved in the case at bar, we shall discuss and show that Commonwealth Act No. 671 was no longer in force at the time the Executive Orders under consideration were promulgated, because even the respondents in the cases G. R. Nos. L-2044 and L-2756, in sustaining the validity of the Executive Order No. 62 rely not only on Commonwealth Act No. 600 as amended by Commonwealth Act No. 620, but on Commonwealth Act No. 671; and afterwards we shall refute the arguments in support of the contrary proposition that said Commonwealth Act No. 671 is still in force and, therefore, the President may exercise now the legislative powers therein delegated to him.
K - "King"
And I was right – he LOVED the frosting/filling, which was really tart and balanced out the sweetness of the cake perfectly.
I rather liked it and I hope you will too.
I started reading the Koran last night and read some more today.
Actions not just words
Never been into poetry, though. Only heard about it at school(and found it very boring, indeed)
“Yeah, why?”
To add to the mayhem, we’re not very good at picking up and putting things away, so in order to even begin to clean, we first have to organize and de-clutter. So basically, we have to clean to clean. We work so hard on the organizing bit that we have no more energy or time to do the actual dusting, vacuuming, etc.
“Dark cemetery grave dirt. A pitcher full. I wonder how much that is?”
This one is an unspoiled spoiler alert, so don’t read the following paragraph if you don’t want to get spoiled. Is that right? Get spoiled. Anyway, do not read the next paragraph. Use a marker or liquid paper or anything to cover the next paragraph. As long as you don’t read it if you choose not to. OK, are you ready to not to read the next paragraph?
Occasionally I will last out and do pancakes or pikelets for a treat.
This is the kind of record that It's Great Shakes was made for, terrific song and almost no presence at all on the net. I only found mention of "Over My Head" on a couple Minaret discography listings and, even there, they misspelled the artist's name.
Oct. 10 Allentown, PA The Sterling Hotel
Meanwhile, in a large stock pot to toast...
It was now almost
You must be prepared to leave comments for challengers, currently 1 challenger in every 10, although you are of course allowed to leave comments for more should you have the time to do so.
There will be a 3rd batch of this workshop which starts on May 5, 2012 until June 16, 2012. Registration is on! Only limited slots. Please visit their website for more details
Following the Champaign celebrations in Cockermouth High Street, Matt commented;
Bands must be from the following states: Illinois, Indiana, Iowa, Kansas, Michigan, Minnesota, Missouri, Nebraska, North Dakota, Ohio, South Dakota, and Wisconsin.
Wouldn't you know, when it happened, all I said..."Prince, that wasn't nice"...last year at this time, almost to the exact day is when I sprained my ankle, and now this!
"Dodger rooters throughout the other New York boroughs went almost as crazy over the first Dodger World Series triumph.
The day after the protests, my best friend called from the airport. She was in tears, explaining that her mother just announced that she was leaving Sarajevo, packed bags laying already at her feet. “I don’t want to leave my friends, my city, “Hana argued pointlessly. Angry and hurt, she was explaining the situation, assuring both of us that she will return within a few weeks, “once everything settles down.”
This disturbed me greatly. I knew that this little dog was in great danger, I knew that the odds were against its survival if it remained out there alone. There was the danger of the highway and other dangers as well. Coyotes would make a quick meal of it if they had a chance. I called from the tractor “Here puppy, come here dog” and saw it stop. But it headed back towards the spot I had first seen it. Now I was torn. We have rescued many dogs. Dogs dropped off at the farm or abandoned in other places, but with that has come heartbreak and great sorrow when they were later shot, poisoned, or run over on the highway. There was anger I felt, that someone cared so little for this dog that had obviously not been exposed to the dangers of highways and had probably been a house dog, but their heart was so cold as to abandon it where its odds of survival were so slim.
So we set off bright and early this morning for the drive to the Jenny Lake Visitors Center. Along with some other Park visitors, we met up with the ranger around 8:20 AM and he told us we would take a boat ride across Jenny Lake and be dropped off on the other side to begin the 1.5-mile hike up to Inspiration Point. Before getting the ticket for the boat ride, he explained, we needed to decide whether we would return to the Visitor's Center via the boat or hike from Inspiration Point, around the lake, and back to the Visitor's Center. The ranger said the return hike would be about 3 miles long, if that is what we chose to do. Lynda and I agreed we could use some extra exercise and so we just bought a one-way ticket for the boat ride. The ranger also warned us that bears are sighted quite frequently around the lake and so we needed to take common-sense precautions and stay alert.
and gravity, scientists say is weak.
The assignment that I had the most experience in developing proficiency with the tools of technology is the Video Project. In doing the video project we were required to create a video advertisement for a book or other thins as approved by the instructor. Due to copyright infringement issues, I am unable to attach the video to this letter but I was forced to work with Windows Movie Maker, a video editing and creating software that I was not at all familiar with. I had to figure out how to manipulate the software to get it to do what I needed it to do. Playing with the software gave me a basic understanding of what to do and how to make the features of the software work. The Chapter that I was able to relate to the creation of the video was Chapter 5: Next Steps from New Media Design (Austin, Tricia & Doust (2007). What that chapter talked about was what type of skills were needed to have a successful career in new media and graphic design. My desired profession is to be a journalist or editor for a major publication and in the chapter, video editing and creation was one of the skills that were needed to work in new media. Knowing that I was able to complete this task has just increased by value to potential employers. There is still other software that I would like to learn but it is a process that takes time.
Better synths have two oscillators. You can detune them, so they don't play at exactly the same pitch. This fattens out the sound or - at extreme settings - makes it out of tune. Some synths have more than two oscillators, which gives you an even fatter, heavier sound.
HENRY JAGLOM: Well, it was a sold script in terms of action. But the dialogue was created by the people in the film, cause we knew each other and how we fit into each others lives. In ALWAYS, I am not a very good cook. So when I tried to cook, I burnt that fish. It made her sick, so she couldn't leave the house. It was a dramatic device, but it wasn't real. But what we're saying in the film, the emotion is real. What we're saying dialogue wise is very real. It takes a lot of practice to tell the truth. But the stuff we're saying to each other, and about each other is very real. I didn't wanna lose her.
The usual approach of science of constructing a mathematical model
Melanie was one of the leaders in the human resistance, fighting to keep Wanderer’s alien race from taking over their bodies and consciousness, even after the aliens — or “souls,” as they refer to themselves — have already conquered Earth.
Ready for the easiest directions ever? I almost feel silly typing them out because the photos are self-explanatory but maybe this will help someone out there! ha. Here you go:
I know it's been months since I posted last. I've heard about it from many of you as well. You never know how many people read this thing until you miss your monthly update. LOL!
Following this opening chapter, Gaus proceeds to describe and evaluate seven different post-Enlightenment theories of liberalism. These are:
"Yes", she looked nervously at a public affairs colleague, "and we're..."
This was a great story filled with suspense, action and mystery. Annelyn’s quest for revenge is something that is repeated throughout history. Pride is an unguarded weakness that has led to the fall of civilizations and war. No spoilers here, as with many of Martin’s works, expect gritty and gruesome deaths.
Raul’s fills and deep fries at least 20 varieties of empanadas to order, filled with all sorts of combinations of beef, pork, ham, sausage, chicken, shrimp, vegetables, and starches and different spices, including Latino (Cuban, Mexican, Argentine, Columbian, Puerto Rican, Spanish) and unconventional (Cheesesteak, Asian, Italian, etc.) flavors. For example the Puerto Rican is a take on Arroz con Gandules (Ham with Pidgeon Peas and Rice) and the Cuban has all the components of a Cuban Sandwich — chopped ham, roast pork, pickles, melted swiss cheese. I was particulary fond of the “5 sausage with lime” and the “Inferno” empanadas (3 chiles with beef). They’ve even got dessert empanadas, such as the “Adam’s Apple” and Guava Jelly with Cream Cheese.
You can see where this is going right?
Hang out with my family. Play with my cats. Do crossword puzzles. I had a chaotic childhood, so relaxing and safe is my preferred adult lifestyle.
"Right then, we're going to sell it to X-Factor so they can cover it."
Thus, “Bonaparte would like to appear as the patriarchal benefactor of all classes. But he cannot give to one class without taking from another.” Ultimately he manages to mobilize all the classes against himself.
Boo lives in an outhouse with Johnny Depp. (They’re SUPER close) and together they have 6 kids while Boo is a programmer. They ride around in their broken truck, carrying 100 million dollars (probably from Johnny Depp) And they spend time in their outhouse with their pet… Miyu’s baby.
In addition to using these terrific apps with our own clients, we are committed to sharing current information about technology with interested families, clinicians, and teachers around the world.
“Shablagoo.” Five months ago, that word would have been complete and utter nonsense to me. Now I know that it simply means that Mint and Berry came together to deliver full flavor and intense crunch. Five months ago, Mint Berry Crunch would have been an unknown name to me as would Mr. Hanky, Clyde, Mr. Garrison, Feegan the Vegan, the Coon and countless other residents of South Park, Colorado. This gaping hole in my pop culture knowledge had grown to a festering wound due to some self inflicted, misconstrued idea that I hated South Park. How I worked that idea into my head I’ll never know but over the past couple of months my college friends (rainbowchair especially) my high school friends, a thirst for well written television and an awareness of the topical messages South Park packs into nearly every episode, has turned my least favorite show on television into my newest television obsession.
"Little Darling, It's been a long, cold, lonely winter. Little darling, it seems like years since it's been here. "
through war, death of kin. Even on the night she did
She designed and created baby layettes and then went door-to-door downtown to the various department stores where management agreed to sell them on commission. They sold, too.
Idle in the absence of lust
You say: “That’s a good girl” sending the message that she is only a good girl when she does something good.
As the mother of son's I quake at the thought of what they will face when they become part of an ethnic minority in their homeland, an event likely to occur much sooner than we once thought. Recent figures suggest the tipping point, when non-whites become a majority in Britain, could be as soon 2043, thirty two years from now, not 2060 as previously thought.
Magnificent, would move among his hinds,
In an attempt to catch up on my beer travels here is the first in a series of post.
Not only are they more reliable in their prevention, but advocates also encourage their use as a way to avoid the often crippling side effects of the Pill that can cause mood swings and depression as hormones affect the brain.
Some new additions for this year include a fashion/wearable art show and a cinema festival.
I first “met" Jon Mayhew through this wonderful portal called blogosphere. It was about four years ago and we had both recently started blogging and, as is the way of the blogosphere, fell in with the same group of bloggers.
I don't write often enough about my Love for this man.
It wasn’t possible to keep all of their memories entirely in sync and three of the children, as they began to get older, found ways to keep diaries and to keep them hidden from the constant surveillance of the researchers. It was an effort to retain a shred of individuality.
Well, would you be at all surprised to know that Tintorera: Killer Shark not only DOESN'T contain a killer shark, but that the shark we do get takes up maybe less than 20 minutes of this whole 85-or-so minute movie?
THANK YOU FOR VISITING. ENJOY YOUR DAY.
I haven't been on the computer much recently. My house guest, Mr. Arthur I. Tis has kept me tied up in knots (literally). Each time I do something with my hands, they would cramp up like a clump of twisted vines! I tried out witting him by sneaking in a few chores or stitching here and there but he would soon catch on to my games.
Hi everyone! My name is Cara from CaraQuilts designs. I am so excited to be able to offer you a block for the Layer Cake Quilt Along. I really enjoyed the Jelly Roll version so this is very fun for me!
Interviewer: Let us conclude the issue with the following question: If Egypt’s national security depends upon Arab national security…
View via Google Reader (I think this is the best way if you have a Google account that you use regularly).
I ask for a moment’s indulgence to sit by thy side. The works
Abed’s Uncontrollable Christmas (unanimously #1)
We had such a wonderful time and hated to see it come to an end, but we are both exhausted! lol
It’s voice pierced my ear drums,
Haggle as much as needed and then be honest as to the price you would pay. If that still doesn't work, just walk away. Yes, it does suck.... but will ensure that you won't regret the price/item later on.
More busy than ever, I find I am hunched over my computer for hours at a time. In researching my exhaustion I have learned that all this computer time has lead to a diaphragm that is restricted which has lead to shallow breathing and less oxygen to my brain. Not good for a creative type like me— I need oxygen! I need energy! I need bright ideas!
There are myriad accounts in the Gospels of Jesus talking with and ministering to people while sharing a meal with them. Food is central to survival, and storing up extra food not just for yourself but also to share with others can create opportunities for you to help feed them both physically and spiritually. You can invite people in for a meal and in the process you can find out what is going on in their lives and share both in words and in actions what the Lord is doing in your life. If they are struggling spiritually, you can offer words of encouragement to them as the Lord strengthens you. If they are struggling to keep food on the table, you can likewise help them from the bounty you are stocking up, doing so anonymously and secretly. There are probably many among us who at times have left much-needed gifts for others outside their door in the middle of the night, following the Lord's admonition in Matthew 6:1-4 to do such things secretly, known only to us and Him. But it's kind of hard to help feed other people if you don't have extra food!
these days it’s pretty hard to travel anywhere without a lot of TO DO. there is so much more that goes into going places than when it was just me. or just me and the spouse.
The last robot is destroying a housing complex and Batman swerves the Bat-plane into an antenna on a power plant, slicing it off and into the robot, electrocuting the robot and causing it to explode. The Bat-plane has lost a wing and crashes into the river......
I've also machine sewn round the edges and round the heart nestie shape too,
Preshow) Santino Marella def. The Miz to Retain the United States Championship
So it comes with a little ABV kick. And as I said, I drank many bottles of Shiner, maybe one too many. I never poured it into a glass (because I am classy!) so I can't note anything about color, or head, etc. All I can tell you is that it smelled sweet, kind of malty, tastes smooth, sweet, and only has a little bit of carbonation.
It’s the perfect time of year to see the bright yellow flowers of the Cassia fistula tree also known as the Golden Shower and locally as the Ratchapruek tree. The delicate and elaborately shaped ‘dok koon’ flower is sometimes used in religious ceremonies and is the national flower of Thailand. There’s an old belief that planting a Ratchapruel tree on the south-western side of your home will bring good luck!
This year is the Queen's Diamond Jubilee and although I am not particularly a Royalist,
And sudden dawn o’erflowed with sunless light,
So let’s take this one step further. Let’s expand on the one (1) site example. There are 10 sites at Z Best Freebies. So, let’s say you are Green on all 10, have chosen the same $135 Cash gift on all and are paying $35 per Green on all. If those same 3 people who went Green for you on that one Z Best Freebies site do the same on all 10, then you will come away with a net profit of $450 (10 x$45).
4. Deal with all the boxes NOW!
My sister comes over to keep the littles and we tackle to crowds,
As much as I love summer, and all the potlucks, picnics and family reunions that come standard, there’s one thing I believe should be banished forever, as it’s the true bane of bikini season...
Next we visited the rooms behind each of the 4 clock dials which was a bizarre experience. The clock survived the Second World War but was defeated by a flock of starlings in 1949 which roosted on the hands and caused the clock to lose 4 minutes. This won't happen again as they now employ 2 hawks to keep away rogue birds.
We have been to visit sweet B today at uni
● Isis Invades Comic-con
8 Distractible (cruel and sexy April)
The greatest part of the Hunger Games where the people who did not play the game, but kept their humanity.
I looked at both the recipes and then wrote out the adjustments, using the spices that a kitchen of a non-Indian might have, or even if they don’t he/she is most likely to come across the necessary ingredients in their local grocery shop. And, with that, I set out to make the dish.
So do I win loser of the year for managing to fall over twice in January? I should not be allowed out without a crash helmet clearly...
Don’t forget to eat your carrots, ya hear?
So do I have any struggles or triumphs? Well, the re-draft is at 95% and I can almost envisage (on the other side of revision) a readable draft for beta readers. The other minor triumph, even though I got told off for forgetting to post there too, was taking part in the November First Five Pages at Adventures in YA and Children’s Publishing. Most of the incredibly generous feedback I got tactfully pointed out flaw after dreadful flaw – invaluable given the intense redrafting I was working through – and the praise was equally generous. Even the odd comment I disagreed with pushed me to think twice about why I was doing something and change or review it accordingly. Great blog, great workshop. You should check it out.
You should definitely try to join us on this challenge because we have 3 fabulous sponsors offering great prizes! These could be yours!
Movado – A Truly Sleek Style Selection
While local gardens are loving the rain, the damp plants have become havens for unpleasant insects like mosquitoes. A few nights ago I decided to tidy up some of the garden and pull out a few weeds....a very easy task, as the ground is soft after so much rain.......and am now suffering from bites, probably mosquito bites. On my arms I can understand, as they were bare - but even allowing for the fact that I was wearing shorts, how ever did I get bitten on the hip?
When every bit of energy has been consumed, when all resources have been exhumed. When all that’s left is ruin’s fumes.
What would you do if you had a second chance with the one that got away?
Please, before you give another penny, take the time to educate yourselves on what is actually going on behind the scenes of your Church.
*And learned what the "lub-dub"is all about. Now I'm all set to take Nathan to the cardiologist....I'll be able to follow the conversation anyway. So will the girls!
My best writing time is first thing in the morning, barely awake with a cup of tea, in my PJ’s in bed, propped up on pillows, laptop on knees. Sorry, no photos of this: no way! I write until I stop making sense, often from 6 or 7 am until 11, 12, 1, 2 or even later… I forget to eat.
So the simple and tasty chilly soya is ready to serve ..
The notion that China's development model of a strong political leadership that effectively manages social and economic affairs provides an alternative to Western democracy and market economies for other developing countries to learn from.
Our bodies have agreed to make this transition with us, but let’s give them some extra acknowledgement and support. They’ve been working hard! When was the last time you thanked your cells? When was the last time you loved your liver? Your teeth? Your spine? When was the last time you gave yourself a hug and showed appreciation for the miracles of life happening every moment inside your temple?
And as to the war on faith foolishness being promoted by the right wing and their media enablers consider this. Yes the Catholic church opposes this policy, and the Democratic party supports it; However, the Republican party favors the death penalty, opposes immigrants rights, supports and cheers on war in the middle east and hates all forms of social safety net programs ... all of these positions are opposed by the Catholic church and the Democratic party.
“What’s wrong with you? You colored outside of the lines,” he said, pointing at a masterpiece torn from one of the books and exhibited front and center on the refrigerator door.
Your test on The Crucible will be tomorrow. Your fourth character journal is due tomorrow as well.
For me to know
-1 lb packages of shredded chicken
Next point of investigation is PICTURES. Pictures are so all encompassing in my life – it’s my whole world and I am also just a picture in it – existing in constant comparison with other pictures, liking and disliking certain pictures while some are irrelevant, some pictures give me a smile and some make me sad, some make me horny and some make to become disgusted, some pictures I want to see again and some are hidden to be avoided, some pictures bring past memories and some make me think about future, some pictures are sticky where they exactly reveal my true desires while others just pass without notice, some I consider more than me while others less – it’s all about pictures pictures pictures.
PAP MP for Tampines GRC Baey Yam Keng is a launching a charm offensive to win the hearts and minds of Tampines residents, especially the young.
This is the cover for Scorpia Rising by Anthony Horowitz - the final Alex Rider novel. It is being released by Walker Books on March 31st 2011, and I'm sure there will be many thousands of youngsters anticipating its release.
It has 17 remix of this track but i only like 3 of them
The developer of Houndshill, Modus, got into difficulties two years ago and administrators from KPMG were then appointed to the group. Since the start of 2010, Centros has been asset-managing the Houndshill shopping centre on behalf of Anglo.
Freeda said, "I would like to see the entire week based around Fluevogs." Freeda, I wore a bunch of Fluevogs throughout this mad try-on just for you, but if you need to see me do all my Fluevogs (minus the two pairs I've purchased second-hand since then), please check out my Fluevog-A-Day series that I did in the spring of 2011.
On the face of the first guy was a look of total control, but as he went on to describe what the Lord has done in his life, humility overtook him. He said, "Humility is not one of my strong suites, but I stand before you humbled because of God's grace."
Tom: Totally. Yeah…for sure!
Studying the differences between people from different parts of the world was common in the past. Now, in more enlightened times, such science has become somewhat taboo, possibly due to the fear that conclusions would be drawn that could be considered racist. Should some topics be off-limits to science, when the potential outcomes are unknown? Is it racist to say that different races are biologically different?
track listing for The Christmas Attic:
Well, except for the crazy hair that everyone had....they were rollling in laughter at some of the hairstyles.
Then we have the 1958 effort known as Queen Of Outer Space, and a little something I like to call The Zsa Zsa Factor.
In December 2009 two
We already understand the movements of the planets affect us deeply. What if the planets are really keying our DNA to the point when the planets align in a way that challenges us… it is at this precise time we can fully change the DNA codings within. Those planetary alignments that seem to pick our lives up and allow us to soar are times we can bring in greatly expanded codes.
I remember thinking at the time that no one would want to
******* Monologue *******
The temperatures were cool…..cool enough that we could open up the windows in the cabin for the first time. Usually it’s either too hot or too cold.
Another big moment was my little sister graduated from college. She is the first in our family to graduate from a university. She graduated with a double major on Saturday & we couldn't be more proud of her. Especially since she was the first. My parents didn't go to college & I only went to junior college and then cosmetology school. My brother will be graduating in two years, so we are really looking forward to that!!
it’s an honor and privilege to lead people! and Lord help me when I begin to loose the awe ..
Bethe Almeras, the wonderful Grass Stain Guru asked me (and a few other folks) yesterday to comment on an Associated Press article about Egalia, a Stockholm preschool that seeks to teach children in as gender neutral a way as possible. I read the article on my phone while sitting in a restaurant awaiting the rest of our overwhelmingly female summer program board to assemble for dinner and drinks.
I'm not at all sure that the average bleeding-heart, thug-hugging pinko would rather commit a "racist" thought or action than be robbed, raped and/or killed by some gutter-ape who happens to be non-white. Certainly the average pinko would pretend that such a dilemma didn't exist -- until it was too late. Liberalism just doesn't equip people to deal with unpleasant realities -- or with any kind of reality, for that matter.
Watanabe raised his as well … with far less gusto.
There is no Muse. It is placing human inspiration–the very world around us–on a cracked and shaky pedestal. Writers need to escape the romantic ideal of the Muse. All artists–especially writers–need to trust their intuition, their inner voice, and pour themselves into the creation instead of sloshing it off onto some empty Muse figure.
He admits to the initial disaster that was Del Posto “where something was always burning.” The restaurant took five years to evolve into the city’s first four-star Italian restaurant thanks to a 2010 re-review from Times critic Sam Sifton: “We laid it out there. Baited him, put the word out in the market to his friends. We played the game. That’s how it gets done. You can’t cheat. Either you’ve got it or you don’t. But if you want a four-star review, you’ve got to go out and tell those people that you’re a four-restaurant.”
Approaching from the shed the bed on the right is for courgettes and is covered by carpet to keep the weeds off until we need the area,(I'll be doing a post sharing my courgette growing secrets in a week or so). Next the bed on the left is covered with fleece and has potatoes underneath, none have poked through yet, but I'm sure it won't be long, we planted them on Good Friday. On the right the allium bed is really taking off with 2 rows of shallots, 3 rows of red onions, 2 rows of brown onions, 1 row of perpetual onions and 2 rows of garlic...
Yeah, well, things don't always go as planned.
uhhhhhhh….
The weather here is chilly again. I think we are finally getting our Spring. It got so warm so quick, now it's making up for it. We have our woodstove going again. I am SO glad we have it. I hurt so much when I'm cold and the woodstove helps me so much.
It cast a program
Amit Bansal answers, If you have an email or document which states the reason why the supervisor did not do your appraisal correctly, then you can raise this issue with the HR and request them to review the appraisal. As I had mentioned earlier, most HR’s have a policy where a review request for appraisal can be initiated.
I sure like the words of support.
When we started walking home, the sun was gone, and it was getting steadily darker. There was enough light to follow the paths through the woods, though. At parts, you could easily see the path, because stretching off on either side of the narrow trail were hundreds upon hundreds of Trilliums, ghostly white in the dark, almost glowing in their paleness.
Brads & dewdrops from stash
Actually, no. Only one-third.
OCEANIA
The Obama campaign continues to come under fire for releasing an ad this week that questions whether Mitt Romney would have ordered the raid that killed Osama bin Laden.
Thanks for reading, and thanks to all those who give me hope and inspiration every day by persevering in your quiet ways.
“The majority of the traditional student body at this and other universities were not yet born on this planet when Abbey died,” said Sanders. “Ed Abbey still lives. Almost all 21 books he wrote during his lifetime are still available to be read.”
They knew this play would not end in death
*please note sarcasm!
Sticking with the same analogy about relationships, a wife cannot function in a healthy marriage if the image of her husband comes from the movies and not real life. Living in a mystical state of who God is does not equal actual understanding of His character. We fool ourselves when we think that God is more free in our imagination than He is in His Word. Only our minds can limit the power of God. When we allow God to be interpreted by our limited understanding, He often comes out looking a little like us, a genie, or a fortune teller.
First the good parts. The interior art gives it a nice old-school flavor although I do miss the cover style that they used for their 3rd edition modules. The module details a ruined castle and its dungeons in a swamp that are pretty generic and are easily dropped into most any campaign setting. While the main plot of foiling the plans of cultists has been done to death, this one does have a clever twist to it by having a table of curses that characters may either start with as a hook or fall prey to while adventuring in the module. Some of the curses are helpful (but only at expense of others) like- "Anytime an uncursed PC suffers a critical hit, the cursed PC gains 1d6 temporary hp" and some are just evil like "The character develops an insatiable desire for human blood; his maximum hit point total is reduced by 5 every day that he does not indulge the mad craving." These effects were fun to use, but were kind of hard to remember once there were several of them in force.
The Sikh Coalition gets hundreds of complaints of unfair treatment and profiling, Singh said. By contrast, he said, the Department of Homeland Security said in its last report to Congress on civil rights and civil liberties that 11 people in the U.S. submitted complaints in the first six month of 2011.
Yet, no expectations.
I think an easy to digest, and common, opinion about unschooling is that it's not for everyone, and won't work for some kids. This is an opinion held by many unschoolers, and that's quite fine. But it's not my opinion.
STAR
we are trying to avoid that here. Stop being lazy and pack your lunch.
Passion is familiar to all of us as an intrinsic motivation for doing things. The passion to explore, to learn something new, to understand something more deeply; the passion to master something difficult. We see these passions in others all around us and have likely experienced them for ourselves.
He continued with telling us about a type of ministry he does that involves a door….
I had a class at the Red Cross all day last Sunday. It was Client Casework. I didn't love it, but I think that's because it was all about paperwork and that's what I do all day. I found it to be a little too much like work, actually. At one point we were acting out a scenario where one person has had their house destroyed and they found a place but it didn't include a w/d and they wanted the Red Cross to supply it for them.
Maisel's Weisse original, a Hefeweizen and 5.4% abv.
Honey roast ham
After a run of authentic Trappist ales recently, I'm interested in an American taken on the version with Dark Horse Sapient Trip Ale.
Even though readers will suspend disbelief, at some level they remember the writer is up above the stage, pulling the strings. Names carrying too much obvious baggage or portent seem to aim the spotlight away from the stage and up at the writer. (Which a writer like Pynchon probably desires.)
I'm tired.
Have a blessed week ahead,
I set a big hotplate the centre of the dinner table and cook up a miso broth, then add in some veggies…and pour in a bunch of sake (yup, the Japanese rice wine! sooo good!).
The inside lights seemed to be forcibly flashing their way through the smoky interior and heavily tinted glass exterior, while the muffled sounds of a dance band seemed to pulsate on the sidewalk under my feet. I would go in there and ask to use their phone. But at the door with its “OPEN” sign flashing rhythmically I paused. I remembered admonishing those who would listen, “Bad things happen to people in bars after midnight. At that hour all good citizens should be at home – safe!” The headline of a newspaper flashed urgently in my mind; “Man shot in Clearwater Night Club”. Even worse would be the smirks and sarcasm of a group of young people who call me ‘uncle’. Anil, Ernie, Ramona, Teeka and… No! They would not allow me to live it down. As I turned away, I saw a young lady talking on (Yesss!!!) a cell phone. I approached her as openly as I could and heard her say into the phone, “Hang on a sec’; there’s a guy coming up to me”. She then gave me her full and focused attention. I stopped and clearly, slowly, explained my plight and asked if she could call the girls for me. “You know where I am. I will call you back in two minutes”, she said loudly and clearly before she hung up. She then offered to dial Marcia’s number and after she made contact she relayed my position and plight. Apparently Marcia had returned to Eckerd Hall to see if I was stuck there and they were at the “Perkins” restaurant right next door. I thanked the young lady profusely, got into the car and sped to the restaurant next door to Eckerd …only to find out that it was an “Applebee’s”. The cleaning guy directed me to the “Perkins” at US19 and Gulf to Bay. Of course! I raced back to “Perkins” and there they were – Rita and Marcia – hungry and frustrated over the turn of events. As we were waiting to be seated, Marcia laughingly remarked that they must have looked like two hookers on the sidewalk.
Thankfully your crew rescues you at the last second. Slavik walks onto his bridge where he is greated by his crew and decides to murder one of them just in case. You then take orders from the most evil sounding robot ever. If you don’t think you’re the bad guys, they why does your helper robot sound like that? Maybe the robot picked its own voice because in the expansion pack it goes rogue and almost takes over the world, so there’s that.
Well me, I was the misfit.
As long the shops don't see off Smith's (THE Smith's not the WH upstart) which is still thriving selling much the same stuff as its mainstream namesake.
HCPC 3466 Alpine Bungalow
May it be so in your own heart.
We have two prizes up for grabs this time! Crafty Sentiments are offering a prize of two stamps of the winners choice from the fabulous selection on their website!
“View To a Kill”, as Millwall take on West Ham
Pat Morley reminds us that we need a ministry aimed at men because, very often, men are the problem. But they are also the solution.
When my good friend girlie came over last week, we had already made plans to have a active day together. Before she arrived I felt like baking a simple apple Tarte Tatin, something sweet before before we would burn off the calories on our beach walk and hike somewhere. Coffee and apple tarte tatin made us comfortable, and the slightly rain convinced us to stay indoors and to open a bottle of wine and watch a movie instead.
The last song of the night was “My Peace”, a short poem his father Woody had written that Arlo turned into the most moving song I’ve had the pleasure to sing. It was the “Kumbaya” on a grander scale, and one that shook me to my core. The entire audience was swaying and singing along, smiles on everyone’s faces and tears of joy threatening to fall. It is the song I go to on an otherwise cloudy day, and I hope it brings a smile to your face like it has mine.
Moreover, photo IDs were recommended by the 2005 Commission on Federal Election Reform, co-chaired by Jimmy Carter. And you surely can’t get into the attorney general’s building without one. Are Stevens, Carter and Eric Holder anti-Hispanic and anti-black?
When he left the room
- We are pleased to see your creations in our challenge, just be cautious not to combine our challenge with more than 5 other challenges.
It's Thanksgiving evening and I'm sitting here typing this post from my IPhone! For this I am thankful cuz I don't want to get out of my comfy chair to go over the 10 feet to my old, slow computer!
This card may be entered in the following challenges:
(Sidenote: I have that ability because for a large portion of my life 80% of my friends were guys. You can learn a lot from them if you just sit back and listen! Ladies…if you ever wonder why you are single. Ask a drunk, male friend of yours who has no interest in you. Prepare for the brutal honesty that comes out. It will make you a better woman. If you’re asking your other single friends…well, consider the source, and their track record. Other single chicks might tell you how to GET a man, but probably can’t tell you how to KEEP one…)
you really only need to oil the pan for the first one you make. there is enough butter or oil in the batter to help them not stick after that. keep in mind, the first one(s) may look terrible, especially if you have never made them before, but with each successive one, you will improve.
APRIL 2012 – JESSICA SIMPSON
I also had a long chat with the Five Points' owner about the current state of the Japanese craft beer scene. He stocks the most commonly exported Japanese micros, including Baird, Hitachino Nest, and Yona Yona. When I mentioned my friend, Chris Poel (lead brewer at Baird), he mentioned that he knows someone who used to work there.
**** 4 stars for creative shelving and cool titles on their main tables!!
PS And the apps work after I canceled my service even though your customer service representative told me they wouldn't. Lying is not cool AT&T. Not cool.
I’d told my sis-in-law what had happened, she was furious that this man would threaten her parents. I told her I actually admired him for standing up for his son and that I’d do the same. She only focused on her parents, knew her brother was nothing but trouble, but didn’t see why it should involve her parents. I told her it should never have involved me either and I wasn’t going to pay my brother-in-law’s debts. Her Mom ended up giving me a cheque and I gave Peter the cheque in about 48 hours.
The key audience for this manual is anyone who is interested in brewing their own Sake. For such individuals, this will be an invaluable reference book. I would also recommend picking up a more general book about the basics of Sake, to better understand this intriguing and delicious beverage. A home wine maker or beer brewer who wants to expand their repertoire should definitely consider buying this book too. A Sake lover would also be interested in this book, even if they don't want to brew their own, as they would acquire a deeper understanding of the brewing process.
Here is some of the great news we got this year:
Next I created some layers for my greeting. I put some Concord Crush cardstock through the Big Shot using the ever popular Top Note die. I then turned the die cut 90 degrees, and cut again to create the shape above. I layered with a couple of squares then a die cut circle made using the Perfect Pennants die and finished with the sentiment stamp from the Perfect Punches stamp set.
The definition of a non performer can be subjective. It is necessary to understand that if an employee is not doing the job that he or she is expected to fulfill, then they will fall in to this group. It could be because the person is not suited for the job or not equipped to take up such responsibility. In such situations, you as the employer should give the person the choice to train for an alternative job that he or she may be better equipped at.
Practical significance
Now that I’m used to using it, I’m want to get my chisel on and make some kind of woodworking masterpiece someday…after I finish the knobs that is. :)
They look like they need to be pruned? Do I prune them?
Now, I encourage the best in each person that I know and meet. I weep for the pain in my friends. I shout for joy when life is good. I have changed who I was to who I am now.
I cry out but you have fallen silent.
Awful, eh? I'm not counting the closer proximity to friends & family, because I will probably see my family just the same amount as I have done here, and while I will gain my UK friends, I will lose my Germany-based friends.
* Frenzy
Early on, I chose pink and blue as my theme in the place and I later added black for a little drama. For my pillows I really lucked out on fabrics- both the solid velvet and flamestitch were cheap remnants scores. A stripe and a chinoiserie-themed pillow (It's actually Goddesses) were an easy way to mix in variety. I love a toile/ scenery type fabric to mix up geometrics and other patterns! I also don't like both sides of the sofa to match exactly. Mix in two similar pillows
On average, digital circulation now accounts for 14.2 percent of newspapers’ total circulation mix, up from 8.66 percent in March 2011. Digital circulation may be tablet or smartphone apps, PDF replicas, metered or restricted-access websites, or e-reader editions. Branded editions, newspaper-owned products such as commuter, community, alternative-language or Sunday-Select type newspapers, make up 4.5 percent of newspapers’ total average circulation, up from 3.36 percent in March 2011.
You may even get lucky and find a vintage "knock-off". That's what happened to me the other day, when I was searching for a small table for a client's tiny breakfast nook. Several frantic texts later, this set was being loaded into the back of my truck!
I painted the turquoise color first because the color was less opaque and if I messed up painting the white it wouldn't show through. It took 2 coats & some touch ups for the turquoise & 4 coats for the white. Also make sure you paint the inside of the drawer because it looks nicer!
Serve over southern cornbread dressing or oyster dressing, white rice, or with potato salad if desired. Sprinkle with file powder if desired and garnish with the green onions. Be sure to serve with hot, crusty French bread and cold beer.
We dog breeders seem to forget that WE created the anti-breeder sentiment in this country by bashing those that we didn't agree with or by bashing those that did things differently than us. And look where we are now....the animal rights terrorists and the bunny-hugger followers have taken our "ideas" and are introducing them as legislation faster than a dandelion growing in summertime. Yes, WE DID THIS TO OURSELVES.
So so tired. I’ve had about five hours sleep in the past two days. Stupid elusive sleep.
hot. . . parsnip
So when BlogHer asked me to answer this question, the answer came pretty easy...
I think there are several reasons why unschooling is very much on the fringes. Also feel free to share your own opinions in the comments, as I think this is a really interesting question to think about and discuss! Now onto some possible reasons:
Shallow and primal desire finding space
6. There are only females in my family. On my mother's side, that is. My great-grandmother was one of three girls. My grandmother was one of three girls. My mother was one of three girls. I was one of three girls (me and my two female cousins; the only people in our generation). I now have two girls, but I did have one son, who didn't live. Just sort of strange, that on the female side, we're pretty much all female.
Row 2: 2 sc in first sc, sc in next 2 sc, 2 sc in last sc, ch 1, turn (6).
Hi! Lori here from ScrappinMyStressAway and I am so excited to show you a Graduation Card I made. This card design can work for many different cards as well.
And the face of the King’s Servants grew greater than the King:
I am writing this letter to apologize for neglecting this blog. I have been away from my writing outlets due to my new company, Anti Bling Store. I started making my own necklaces last summer and got huge responses. The last month I have been working diligently to spread the word on a limited budget. When you don't have money to spend, you must spend time on it. Things have been working out pretty well so far, aside from the lacking of post on this beloved blog.
“I knew you’d appreciate that.”
If you follow me on Instagram---a lot of these things will seem repetitive. And for that, I apologize. But, honestly, I think the ability to upload quick photos and captions suits me quite well... and I end up posting often in that format. With the blog, you have to think. And, let's be honest, we all know that the act of "thinking" is hard for me.
This is becoming a pattern: Liko is narrating his own life, living simultaneously in his life and in the story of his life. His imagination is his life. It's a little bit disconcerting to watch, but also kind of cool.
Net Profit Royalty Clauses: Net profit royalty clauses--which calculate royalties not on the list price of your book, or on the publisher's net income, but on net income less a menu of additional expenses--can reduce your royalties to a pittance.
1089 **D-X/23/1990. “‘Is it a god or some human being?’ (Plato, Laws 624A): Further Thoughts on the Separation of Church and State.” Faculty Speakers Series, The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1995(4), above, pp. 119-32.)
What gets me is not that some old man has gone completely off his rocker. That's just a fact of life that happens sometimes. What grinds my gizzard is that there are so very many willing to blindly follow him on his journey to la la land. Even when he tells them that he's based this prediction on just a couple or three Bible verses. Really? Seriously? Even if you choose to use the Bible as your authority on this question, it's quite a simple matter to shoot down this guys delusions as complete BS. Starting with (but not exclusive to) 'No man knows the day or the hour, not even the angels, only God himself'. Easy, no math or contortions required. Seriously, don't these people ever read their own Book?
So if anyone reading this can tell me how long they'd expect an iPod touch to last, could you let me know? Also any thoughts on alternatives? I know Samsung have one, but how well do Samsung devices last?
He stopped beside her not quite to the doorway just to watch the way that her eyes narrowed suspiciously over lips bearing impatient purse. “I try to ignore such unpleasantness as the fallacies your modern minds dream up with too great frequency as of late. Science has been the absolute ruin of all I know” he frowned and caused a small wafted cascade of powdered grayness before his chin from the deep crease to the center of his bottom lip, one that didn’t recover smooth complete appearance with the re-relaxation of his mouth’s set.
Clown Shoes
In case you’re in the same boat, or if you’re lucky enough to vacation here for the holidays, here are a few things to fill your days with the cheer and charm of Paris at Christmas.
“Maybe Paprika? Chili powder?” Chuckling DJ moved into the kitchen to find cat food, “I guess I'm supposed to feed you.” He found the empty bowls on the floor. Water was refilled and replaced. DJ watched the cat sit on his haunches in the middle of the tiled floor. After finding a bag of dry cat food under the sink, DJ refilled that bowl, too. “There. Can we be friends now?”
It was a bright, sunny day when we left Farm Country, but the closer we got to the city, it started to snow. What a fun, Christmas-y day this is going to be, I thought! Scott was driving since I tend to get a bit of road rage (or so he says) and I sat back and directed him on where to turn, etc. We got to our exit and made the appropriate turns and there she was....SELF PARK...on the right-hand side of the road! Woot! I said, "Scott, there's the self park. Pull on in there and we'll park and walk to the theater!" I was feeling so proud of myself.
Amelia piped up then, “Why don’t you take Morgan to the movies Saturday? That would really stir up the gossipers.”
But she streamlined the room by clearing out all the excess and making the back wall a major focal point. Doesn't the window look twice as big? I love the chunky table with the delicate wire chairs too, such an eclectic look. See, sometimes mix-and-match is a good thing! See more on her blog My So Called Home.
A project I have been working on focuses on motivating employees to change their attitude in the workplace. We are incentivising them to build communities around using less energy. This is a good example of how old habits can be changed and new ones created at local level.
“And include Tibetans throwing fireworks, not for the New Year but to get people away from the stalls of their competition. Write about the cobblestones, the dustiness of it, the bright sun, & almost overlooking Dr. Ho. And the woman before us who seemed to have a good consultation. And say that if you can’t afford to visit him for a consultation, you can reach him online for his teas (and the Jade Dragon Snow Mountain Chinese Herbal Medicine Clinic) at jdsmchmcl@yahoo.com.cn.”
Behavior psychology went to a point of no return when it developed a whole body of knowledge now accepted in recruitment of employees called Body Language Analysis BLA. There is a billion dollar industry to coach how to sit, talk, move body while facing interviews. Though this body language is worst in analysis of human behavior and even worse in analyzing women behavior it is used any way as authentic scientific desccipline. It is worse because it does not take cultural sensitivities in to account. According to this body of knowledge BLA, if a woman sits in cross legged position while talking to a man, it means she is shunning sexual advances of the man she is talking with. But if she sits in regular non cross legged position then she is willing to carry relationship with the man. This gross ‘scientific conclusive’ assumption about the modesty of the women is the first thing to be challenged in the public or courts. But none ever bothered about this because many may not care to read what is written in English. In oriental countries it is not culturally correct to sit in cross legged position for either men or women before elders and teachers. This does not mean any woman who sits in non cross legged position is willing to look favorably towards men for sexual advances. This one example shows how bizarre the human behavior analysis is turning in modern times.
The monk held out a hefty bowl filled with a strong brown liquid that reeked of licorice and dirt. He said something in Vietnamese, something Rainer could not quite make out. The monk then pantomimed drinking from the bowl, and from the expression on his face Rainer had the feeling that refusal was not acceptable. He took the heavy clay bowl from the waiting hands. The odor arising from the bowl made him gag. Hot and bitter, it felt like thin mud coating his gullet. It hit his stomach like lead shot. The addict thought it was not going to stay down, and minutes later his prediction proved correct.
If you are overwhelmed by everything that needs to be done before the Christmas holiday--buying and wrapping gifts, putting up a tree, decorating, baking--then you will want to skip this post. You don't need to add another thing to your "to do" list. On the other hand, if you are in need of a simple, satisfying task, read on.
"Wouldn't it be great if I could have the best of the wit and wisdom of The Ad Contrarian in one handy little eBook that I can read any time I need a dose of reality or just something to take to the toilet?"
I do not think that I avoided searching until my late 30s out of fear. Prior to my experience with my search, I had very little reason to fear. I had such a great growing up, marriage, family, etc., that I think I was pretty sheltered–and I really did kind of expect good things to come from a search. (Good things have come–just not in the packages I was thought I was looking for.) Part of this is my personality too–I always expect that things will work out OK. NOW, however, I have spent quite some time in this little search bubble (which is common for searchers), and I am perhaps a little more paralyzed. Out of pain, I have developed self-medication/habits that comfort me, and I am afraid to let go and return to a life without the ones I sought–my birth parents/my siblings.
the best part,
1 latticework
Through out the summer we've gotten out and about to explore the city and of course find out what would become our favorite spots. One of our favorite restaurants is an Italian place (if you know me, than this should come as no surprise) called Cucina. Great food with lots of vegetarian options for us, not many vegan, but hey we'll take what we can get over here in the Caucuses.
A person’s requirement for vitamin B complex may be increased by such conditions as pregnancy, breastfeeding, emotional stress, and physical stress due to surgery or injury. People who are very physically active require extra riboflavin. Use of birth control pills also increases the need for certain B vitamins.
"No. Not anymore. Let's circle back the way we came."
Then labelled each of the capital cities. Meanwhile I printed out a sheet of labels for all of the captial cities and placed them in our math treasure box.
Lupus shook his head again. And frowned.
MRR: What's Radio 2?
Adam's flat was dark, warm and smelled delicious. That was my comment when I got in. When I opened the door to his lounge, "Surprise!!!" shouted everyone. All my colleagues and friends were there. I was so shocked!!
I love Le Fournil, in the lower part of the village of Bonnieux. The restaurant is cut out of the rocks and you can sit outside by the fountain in summer. 04-90-75-83-62.
Numerous, quality studies demonstrate that students regress significantly during long holidays.
God bless Prince William and Princess Catherine of Wales.
Chris Petrella (REP) 0.82% 767
If there was one thing for readers to take-away about how to create a great space, what would that be?
Rule of international morality
– Sir James Lovelock, BBC Interview
In the few papers I did find which held some relevance for our context, the results were circumspect about the overall value of preschool. On the positive side, there seems to be a consensus that middle class populations do derive some advances in cognitive development from preschool (see this report for more). However, these gains are small. One report estimated that the difference between children who attended preschool and those who did not amounted to the ability to answer one more question correctly on the test instrument. This same study also found that this effect fades over time. On the negative side, another paper concluded that any cognitive gains come paired with a negative trend in measures of social development, though exactly how social development was measured is not clear to me.
All physical diseases including cancer, heart disease and even skin complaints have been helped with Hypnotherapy. Several reports have concluded that psychological factors should be taken into account in the treatment and management of tinnitus(1).The power of suggestion and mental imagery is a tool all too often overlooked but it can be of help. We found one study conducted in England which concluded that over one third of tinnitus sufferers who were given hypnotherapy found it helpful. The report concluded that hypnotherapy “seemed to help them tolerate their tinnitus better , although loudness and quality were unaltered.” (2).
do this time of year. They're now just starting to turn more of the purplish plum color
Out at 8:17 I went last night, one minute after the stupid website promised me my moon. Nothing. 8:30. Nothing. 9:00. Not a damn thing. See?
Ever since we bought our Sumner table a few months back, I've been vying for a white bench in lieu of two chairs. I love the concept of a dining table with a bench. It tones down the whole "formal" eating vibe and brings a casual, welcoming feel to the table. The problem with benches is that they're expensive. I'd had no lucking finding anything I remotely liked for under $500 smackaroos.
The cat image is from Kanban and is called Egyptian Bastet and the backgound card is simply called Egyptian. The lettering is gold peel-offs and the blue dots are from Craftworks Card Candi range to match the blue on the image, I've also used some Bling gold jewels to add a bit of sparkle.
Below are photos of what my window screen now looks like. He/she has chewed the screen to where it now resembles swiss cheese!
I will rejoice that while everything has a purpose,
When I unveiled the GoGo squeeZ to the girls they were happy to give it a try. Because it wasn't grapes or bananas and it came in a package which made them think it might just be junk food. Ha! Take that, Jessica Seinfeld!
For example, CISPA allows the disclosure of any information “pertaining to the protection of a system or network” from disruption, destruction, or theft or misappropriation of private or government information or intellectual property. It is also allows the government to use the information in myriad ways, including those not necessarily tied to cybersecurity. The PRECISE Act, on the other hand, creates a third-party quasi-governmental entity—the National Information Sharing Organization—to route all disclosures between private entities and the federal government. According to this organization’s proposed operational guidelines, disclosed information must be used only for cybersecurity purposes.
We finally had a happy ending to our journey on December 20th when we delivered healthy twin boys at 37 weeks exactly. They weighed in at 6 lbs. 10 oz. and 5 lbs. 14 oz. I was HUGE. We feel more than blessed to be their parents and we promise not to take anything for granted. I look at them every day and even though they are 5 months old now, I still can't believe they're mine. Mine to cherish, protect and love unconditionally.
then legally freeing.
I never remembered to send them.
mixed with Irish Breakfast
That leaves each nation with the politically unsavory option of bailing out its premier banks with taxpayer money, and squeezing the money out of its citizenry via higher taxes and austerity. That assumption of bank debt will in turn trigger downgrades of heavily indebted sovereign nations such as France — moves that will raise rates and make the bailout even more costly to taxpayers, who will also be suffering from reductions of income due to global recession.
I wrote this post last year, when the girls were three-and-a-half. I was blindsided by such a question from such a little child. How could she be questioning the magic already? It seems, though, that since that skepticism was resolved, she and her sister are now firmly in the grip of all kinds of childhood magic–the Easter Bunny, Santa Claus, the Elf on the Shelf, and even Seamus the Leprechaun, a friend of the Elf’s who brought chocolate coins for St. Patrick’s Day.
3.) If you are sick, you must go to the doctor and get a doctor’s note to prove that you were ill. Thus, you must get out of bed (when bed rest is often the best cure), force yourself to go out into the chaos of the city and descend into the cest pool of public transportation as you attempt to secure the proper paperwork. It is often easier to simply go to work…
Spring is here and We're back with some old and new projects.
I like how it turned out, but not the colour I used for the clothing.
God called the people of Israel to leave Egypt and come out of slavery in order to enter their own Promised Land. It meant they had to change a way of life they had known their whole lives. Instead of being told what to do everyday by a taskmaster, they were now being led by the cloud of God that led them into the desert with the ultimate goal of entering their own Promised Land.
Elvis Presley In the ghetto US
As Chuck says, a road is for long-distance travel, and it functions most efficiently at maximum speed with the minimum number of intersections. A street is a place for commerce and other social activity, including local travel, and it functions best at low speeds with lots of connections to other streets and spaces. A country road is for medium-distance travel, and it functions best when no one is trying to use it as a highway or street.
I do need rest and peace.
It falls between the two stools of the CEO and the head of Human Resources, in many companies I have observed or worked with/spoken to.
Ways to stay entertained indoors - playing Dr. Who snap whilst dressed as Spiderman:
They ask no quarter...they think about no quarter...With no quarter quarter.
Devon is headed to the ring, he defends his Television Title, tonight.
I particularly resent killing characters just to make another character suffer. Don Quixote gives a lovely speech and dies in his bed, but it is poor Sancho whom I mourn. His master has gone to fool’s heaven, but he remains on earth bereft of all the promises the Knight offered him, he has no island to rule, no riches to share with his family, no illusions. That is truly heartbreaking. I wonder if Cervantes realized how unfair he was to Sancho.
"It's my job to run defensive operations." Pevan couldn't help the curt tone clipping her words. She kept her face forwards, fixed on the door to the cell, trying to ignore Notia.
Cotswold Premium Lager comes in at a more expected 5%. More mention of the German purity law alongside the information of 4 weeks lagering, Liberty & Hellbruker Hops & Maris Otter malted barley. I’m not going to become the type of geek that recognises the differing flavours of hop & malt varieties, but heh, it does add an air of sophistication.
1st place = $20.00 gc
Behemoth - 2002-02-10-Moscow,Club Svalka,Russia
Caiaphas, the high priest, sneers that they know nothing at all. He advocates that killing Jesus is the best solution to the problem. “You do not realize that it is better for you that one man die for the people than that the whole nation perish,” he says. He prophesies that Jesus will die for the Jewish nation, “and not only for that nation but also for the scattered children of God, to bring them together and make them one.” After this prophesy the council plots continuously on how they can take Jesus’ life.
I believe …
With all this said, he beat all three of these fighters in amazing fashion, showing off great boxing skills, and good punching power. He also showed against Cotto that he can weather the storm and has the heart to overcome the speed bumps that ever fighter will run into at some point in their career. And not only did he beat a former champion, Carlos Baldomir, he was the first fighter to knock out Baldomir in over 16 years.
If you'd like, take a look at what other Crew Members thought of these products. Each of the products I mentioned here were reviewed so if you're interested in any of them you will be able to find reviews on each!
My wife waited, and sure enough, here she come down the hall with a cup of tea for me and my wife watches as I drink it up, then the wife says, “Did it ever occur to you that the only place our daughter can reach to get water is the toilet?”
“In the United States of America, we are greater together than we are on our own. This country advances when we keep that basic American promise — if you work hard, you can do well enough to raise a family, own a home, send your kids to college, put a little away for retirement. And it doesn’t matter who you are, where you come from, what you look like. That’s what has created this extraordinary country of ours. That’s what we’re fighting for. That’s the choice in this election.”
That's a very quick update as to what I've been up to in the last few weeks. Thanks for visiting my blog today and now I'm home again and well (was sick for two months this year), I hope to get back into some serious card making.
Hope you enjoy, boys and toys, nickels and rhymes.
Interested parties desiring to make comments may do so by submitting them electronically to the following e-mail address DOWPublicNotice@ky.gov or by submitting written comments to the public notice coordinator, Division of Water, 200 Fair Oaks Lane, 4th Floor, Frankfort, KY 40601.
Superteachers can really embrace Pintrest in the classroom as a source tracking tool. The course I teach is called Professional Communication and Presentation, and we are focused not only on developing strong content but also strong visual presentation. Pintest can be used in my class to pin source material for presentations as well as to pin images to use in a presentation. Superteachers who have used Pintrest: how did you implement the website in your classroom?
Adding these four, we already have more than £1 billion, but the projects get cheaper as you go down the list. You will love this one though, for a mere £13,999,992, the object being to fund DFID secondments to the EU:
Now this is when the story takes a one-eighty everything is in his point of view and it tells about his life with her as his hand.
I promise to show you better pictures when everything is in its place. I just couldn't wait to show you any longer!
CA-06 Lynn Woolsey NY-22 Maurice Hinchey
In my email, I was surprised to find my unasked for horoscope appearing again.
I know, I know. Who uses roll-on deodorant nowadays? lol. I never thought I would use a roll-on, BUT, this stuff is pretty amazing and a FABULOUS price!!! Looking at the price, I would think this stuff is crap…but I’m surprised! It really works!
She chose her material well in Bach as his composition already has something of the geometrical in it. Also he manages to do so much with so few notes it helped the record to work in a practical sense. Mozart would have required so much more work and been close to impossible to realize as well as Bach – matter of fact I don’t know of a genuinely 100% electronic Mozart realization.
Now I get to see the other wild side, that being Chicago. I haven’t heard any trucking horror stories out if there like you do from New York so maybe it won’t be all bad. I might even get to sample the cuisine while I’m there, who knows?
Earlier this month I wrote this little diddy about the whole Katie Roiphe feminists-can’t-be-submissive-in-bed thing, and then a few days ago my mom and I had another phone conversation on the topic that went something like this:
There is a page where people have shared their astral experiences with Belsebuub. You can find them here: http://www.belsebuubcommunity.com/share-an-experience-youve-had-with-belsebuub/
We began to explore that question a month later when she came for a four-day visit.
He also pursued his Zionist passion, working closely with Zionism’s prominent Revisionist leader, Zeev Jabotinsky, as his personal secretary in the United States during World War II. The Revisionist movement was uncompromising in its political positions and differed sharply from the socialist Zionists of the early 20th century. Netanyahu opposed the United Nation’s 1947 Partition Plan.
I have opinions, but honestly, I want to hear your ideas before throwing mine out there.
But I am equally careful about all the food I buy which involves animals. Animal produce in my house should be free range, without exception, and organic if at all possible.
The slap and plop were obscene threats. Some sat
-You eat 7 ounces in your bottle, and you usually have 5 bottles a day.
Robinson, whose story was featured on the PBS series "Frontline," was paroled in 1997 and immediately began scraping together the money to pay for his own DNA tests, ultimately proving his innocence and winning a pardon from the state.
But the squire seemed struck in the saddle; he was foolish, as if in pain,
They really haven't changed that much. Guffi still tries to force Coldplay on us and Jói and I still argue on who's better, The Smiths or The Cure.
I hope that those who have family members who serve in our forces are reunited safe and sound very soon.
...I sure do love that boy!
To share the gospel.
I just smile....whilst looking into her pretty face.
I hope to see you for CC2C!
Can anybody see me in front of The Bulldog – Leidseplein belting out Little Wing?
I have so enjoyed working with all of you during my time at Georgetown! I’m amazed at how the Lord has knit together such an incredible community through The Gathering at Georgetown and I’m definitely heartbroken that I will not be with you all in the fall to see the Lord continue to work through and in each of you. But please know that I will continue to pray earnestly for ministry on campus, and for each of you. I consider my time working with students at Georgetown to be one of the sweetest and most fruitful seasons of my life and I hope to continue to be as involved in ministry there as I can, albeit from a distance.
I was also able to locate the couple in the 1940 Census living with a son–I’m guessing Isaiah? It looks like “Iz” to me.
Intertwined with this sense of continuity is the idea that all current and future events can be seen as having already happened—a mystic notion borrowed from the indigenous tribes of northern Canada, and explored in more detail in Wiebe’s 1994 Governor General Award-winning book, A Discovery of Strangers. Indeed, it is an elder of the Dogrib tribe who teases out for Adam the comfort to be derived from this belief. As he explains, “if everything can be seen as having already happened, then there is nothing, further, to be scared of.” In losing one’s connection to the past, however, one is deprived of the stabilizing influence of such understanding.
Some of these blogs might be new to you, but they are ones that I look forward to reading on a daily basis. Thankfully, I don't have to pick The Elementary again, because I've got her covered as the person who bestowed this honor...
So, besides jewellery, and cooking, I love to knit. Specifically, I love knitting scarves and shawls, because they're easy and uncomplicated, and I find the repetition very soothing. Almost meditative. Since I've been off work, I have knit myself 3 scarves and a 'prayer shawl' that I love (but Mr. Wild* calls me "Granny" when I wear it outside the house) plus one scarf for my sister in law. I've knit all but one scarf in Lion Brand Homespun, because I love the feel and texture of it, and that it's machine washable and dryer safe. I also love the 29 or so colourways that it's available in. In fact I love it so much that all 4 (and the 2 unfinished/ongoing) finished projects have been in different colours!
The key message in the national planning policy framework is sustainability. The definition of the term sustainable development is a benchmark that any developer will be basing any future planning applications on – “Sustainable development is development that meets the needs of the present without compromising the ability of future generations to meet their own needs” . That means that if a development is deemed sustainable it will be approved in accordance to the framework, unless negative impacts outweigh the positives.
One employer tells of an awkward interview situation that illustrates the point:
And for the record, I’m trying that dryer-sheet trick tonight, so I’ll be back to let you know if it’s as good as she says it is.
If the Internet has produced any change in the power relationship between consumers and marketers, it may very well be in favor of the marketers. The amount of information they are collecting, warehousing, and selling about us is outrageous and alarming.
The delay meant that New York was not the first place to introduce FAR, or Incentive zoning, those ‘honours’ lie with Seattle and Chicago respectively. The principles behind the 1961 ordnance were however copied globally.
For this project I needed:
You say they came and they took all we had possessed
We got all of our belongings out of my dad's truck, thanked him a million times, and went inside the house to take a three hour nap. We woke up, groggy as hell, but happy to be home. I shotgunned one coffee and inserted another directly into my veins so we could take care of all the shit we had to take care of that day. It was Friday, and we both had to be back at work on Monday, so all of the legal crap had to be done immediately.
Josef Strauss: Delirien waltz
Each one of them gave their very best and more. And for us it was a true joy to have them as we too became better simply being with them.
5. I have now gone 5 full days without Diet Coke (or any soda). I'm insanely tired, but hoping that will wear off soon.
Peter, one of the 12 that remained with Jesus, said:
(source: Johan Meyer, LookLocal.co.za ) Moreover, two of the three black adults who were charged with Gebhardt's murder, Sibusiso Ntuli (19) and Ndiphiwe Mkhungekwana (19). were given a mere R2,000 bail. AfriForum has since decided to become involved with the case after it seemed like no progress has been made in it since he died in November. The three suspects handed themselves in to police in March and April. The 22-year-old Mdingi's bail application was refused as he was considered a flight risk. The three accused face charges of murder and assault.
Paper Source is dangerous. I went in there to buy a birthday card and came out with a scrapbook, these little corner thingys that you attach to your pictures to make them look like they are framed in your book (the technical term is self-adhesive photo corners) and about 8 different colored pens. $63 bones later I feel as if I am master of my “domestique” domain and am going to create the best looking scrapbook EVER. Reality starts sets in when I return to my apartment. Jake sat on the scrapbook and got hair all over it. My lint roller is out of sheets…have to pick some up later…
My husband agreed to take over child care at night after he returned from work, if I could schedule classes at that time. I began classes at the local college and had no idea about a major, satisfied at first just to complete the last of my general education requirements. And then I met Leah.
But if the group won't be on camera now, the film certainly doesn't lack for footage of them back in the day. One of the positive side-effects of McLaren's relentless promotion antics is that nothing the Pistols ever did wasn't captured on tape, so all the legendary, press-baiting disasters—the Screen on the Green, the Queen's Jubilee, their horrifically mis-judged U.S. tour that ended with Rotten's departure after the January show in San Francisco—are not only referenced but shown. Temple's use of contemporary pop culture relics, some of which are a direct response by establishment entertainment to the sudden, feared rise of the band, can be invasive and repetitive, but it's amusing and revealing to see the Pistols slowly incorporated as one of those pop culture elements in a manner that both softens them and only makes them more enduringly snarling and unyielding.
I will be joyful in God my Savior.
‘Where the mind is without fear and the head is held high;
I don't feel guilty and I'm not beating myself up and I'm not asking you to tell me I'm a great Mom. I'm guessing Bean and Peabody didn't notice a huge difference in their everyday lives. Taking time for my own interests and pursuits can actually make me better at nurturing and encouraging theirs. I just know that last week I let the emotional, heart-balance slip too far toward myself, and too far away from my number one job: them. They got some good stuff from me -- Bean and I had a great date yesterday afternoon - lunch and a play with our friends, and I set aside time every day to spend reading to Peabody. But they also got left to their own devices at times that, when I see them in the rear-view mirror, I wish they'd had their Mom fully engaged, loving and laughing and comforting and guiding rather than impatiently scolding or barking instructions over a shoulder as her eyes were locked on this bright, magnetic screen.
DON’T: Shout across the office to your colleagues, if you need them urgently get up and walk over to their desk. If you act like this your more impolite colleagues will think it is okay to shout at you for whatever they need.
I thought about staying up, but now I think I will just try to get some sleep, and face the answer in the morning.
69 22 23.63 S , 76 22 19.11 E
“At least we can let doctors know and your mom know that, you know what? Maybe this isn’t going to help. Maybe you’re better off not having the surgery, but taking the painkiller,” responded Obama
- Tulip Poplar Honey from Maple Valley Farms – Pittsburgh, PA
i love that you "get" jokes now.
I believe she laughs.
“This chicken can do more than math,” stated Ibis now staring at the chicken with wide eyes, and not a small amount of fear. He knew at that moment that he had seen this chicken somewhere before, but for the life of him, he could not remember how or when.
Formal reports of research – including the methods, data and conclusions – that are subject to the scrutiny of expert scientific reviewers are the bedrock of the ‘literature’ from which we learn and to which we constantly refer. Yet if the scientific community were to be asked to devise the best way of communicating these reports today, drawing on the full capability and capacity of the internet, is it likely we would end up with the current publishing model? I think not.
“Good morning, Ship.”
Origen: One thing they know which is true concerning Him; they esteemed Him a Prophet, though not understanding His greatness in respect of His being the Son of God. But the rulers feared the multitude who thought thus of Him, and were ready to fight for Him; for they could not attain to the understanding which the multitude had, seeing they thought nothing worthy concerning Him.
I adore the little birds from the Lawn Fawn Making Frosty Friends stamp set, so I decided to use them. I used the snowflakes from the the same set, and the sentiment came from Bows and Holly. You might be able to see a little of the sparkle. I added some to their scarves and to the centers of the snowflakes. I pleated the ribbon and added a couple of gemstones.
“No, ma, there’s no one there. That’s why I came to the cave hoping to find you, or anyone for that matter.”
thanks that it wasn’t them who bought the bullet. Hey guys, get this
We are working hard on developing your language. You know words such as Apple and ball... mommy and daddy. You love to count to the number three always skipping the number one. You love to point to your eyes, nose, head, hair, and ears. Sometimes even pointing to the right one. Your favorite words are Kitty and Bubbles. Even though you have said tons of words your verbal communication is more like gibberish. But we keep working on them.
We had the house appraised this week and the appraiser said that it was the unfinished 2nd floor bathroom that is really in need of attention more than anything else. Time to start looking (again) at tile patterns in order to tile the shower surround, with built in shower shelves.We decided we're going to use the large 1'square tile we already own and just get geometric with it rather than invest in different tile.
Oh, does easy going mean that you put out and does nice gentleman mean, but not with me ?
Pinks
You should watch this film if not for the eye candy and
Some conflicts are unavoidable and Haidt is not suggesting that liberals should stop being liberal—rather, that they will be more successful if instead of telling conservatives that their moral intuitions are wrong, they seek to shift them in a liberal direction by accommodating, as far as possible, their anxieties.
If you’re ever stuck looking for a quick, filling salad that is perfect for a light lunch or to accompany something grilled, then look no further. This salad is one of my favourites to enjoy in the spring and summer months.
I’ve taught classes in altered books, handmade books, collage art and mixed media art. I’ve designed in the past for Grafix and I am currently on the Alpha Stamps design team. I specialize in very intricate multi-layered and textured art; which I’ve christened as “organized clutter”.
Why? Mainly because I make very few choices in the stories I help tell. And the ones I do make, which are creative ones that relate to style and rarely substance, are subject to extraordinary constraints.
I’d like to leave it at that. I’d like to leave it with a very simple: God made a way where there seemed to be no way. God opened up what we had closed. God ripped apart that which we sewed together. God destroyed that which divides us and enabled us to be one again. I find this refreshing and encouraging and it gives me hope. There are a million ways we humans try to ‘come together’ and ‘make peace’ and ‘live as one.’ And not one of them ever works. In Jesus, however, and because of his death, all those things which previously kept us apart have been destroyed.
I love to read. My average is at least one book per week, and has been for many years. But when I started making blankets with our local chapter of Project Linus, it really cut into my reading time. So I went to the Glenview Public Library and took a look in the audio section. There were plenty of books from my “to be read” pile (OK, it is a bookcase. An overflowing bookcase. With piles in other rooms.) to be found. I began checking them out and was back “on pace” in no time.
I will try to update in a few weeks ONCE I HAVE THIS BABY just in case anyone out there still reads our blog
I was recently speaking to a friend of my mother's who was educated in the late 50's and early sixties, partially at a convent school. Speaking of her school days, she recounted one history lesson, given my a middle aged, American nun. The lesson had been about Russian history, specifically the Bolshevik revolution, however, the nun soon strayed from the curriculum and began speaking about events which at the time were quite recent, the uprisings against soviet rule which occurred in Poland and Hungary.
I’ve seen Him do it before. He can work miracles.
7. When I can, I like to try to figure out movie soundtracks on the piano. Some that I have figured out are “He’s a Pirate” from “Pirates of the Caribbean” and parts of the “Chronicles of Narnia’” theme and parts of “Forrest Gump.” I am currently trying to figure out “Up is Down” from “Pirates of the Caribbean: At World’s End” and “Arrival to Earth” from the first Transformers movie. I haven’t necessarily seen all these movies – I just enjoy their soundtracks.
In these half-dozen years, the copyright owner has emerged as The Prisoner, or, to use a Lennon song title, "Nigger of the World." Everyone recognizes now that Blacks, gays, Muslims and even illegal immigrants have rights...but Google and Hacktivists and greedheads don't believe copyright owners do. Copyright is not considered a human right, and people snigger at the very words "intellectual property." Having black skin could get you killed. Now, it's having an idea and asking to be paid for it. You're told: "Give it away free. If you don't, you'll be sorry! We won't let you win, you bastard!"
Home is such a powerful, visceral word that resonates in every human being, the idea of a place where you belong. But somehow, over my years of growing up, it has seemed to elude me, how it always felt like it was here but inexplicably over there at the same time. Every part of me seemed miles and centuries apart and each place and time called itself my home.
In the beginning of April, Todd also started a new job. He went from being a maintenance man on the same property for over 8 years to now he's the manager at a sister property! It was quite the adjustment for our family and really threw him for a loop. The learning curve was much higher than he expected and there really wasn't a good training done for him. He's started to settle in and is doing a wonderful job! It has meant no more on call for him which has been WONDERFUL!! It means he doesn't have to get up at 2 am to go snake out someones toilet, or leaving at 4 am because someone is locked out!!!
Have a look and then I'll take you back through the process over the next week and give some much deserved kudos to everyone who helped make it happen. And tomorrow we'll be announcing the winner of Pure Green Magazine! Yippee! Much love and thanks to those who were able to come and celebrate the opening this past Sunday. What a time!
While containing numerous attempts to mislead the audience, a couple of workout montages, one shower scene, and a bizarre moment where one heterosexual man compliments another heterosexual man on the cuteness of his shorts, it was the film's supernatural elements that separated Death Spa from the overcrowded spa-set slasher heard. Also, the gore had an explosive quality about it that was fresh and exciting. What I mean is the blood seems to spew rather than ooze, and, on some strange level, I appreciated that. In addition, never before have I seen a man get his throat torn out by a frozen fish moments after he failed to save a female bartender from having her hand shredded by a homicidal blender.
“I'm going away for the summer,” Jess said.
US President Barack Obama is greeted by Marine Gen. John Allen, the top US commander in Afghanistan, as he arrives on stage to address troops during a visit to Bagram Air Field on May 1, 2012 in Afghanistan.
Find someone to rent the house to.... check.
Needless to say the Jaffer family are covered in my book in three glorious generations: Patriarch Bandali Jaffer, who was one of the early itinerant traders collecting cotton from farmers on his bike and cart; Honourable SBJ himself as an MP and benefactor of several Muslim schools; and daughter Mobina as the youngest (until then) senator in the Canadian government as the senator for British Columbia.
I thought about that for a minute. "So, the hero's dead, but he's still sexy, is that what you're saying?"
Things were a little tougher with my children. I'm proud to raise them as critical freethinkers. They question just about everything I do, and it's sometimes a struggle. I found myself talking to a wall, when I introduced this new way of life and tried to reason with them about the benefits of living like this. After all, to them this meant that everything they loved (cookies, pancakes, rice, pasta, bread etc etc) would go away. Sure, the almond flour pancakes were quickly adopted instead of the "real thing". But this didn't mean, that they would buy into the paleo lifestyle altogether.
I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself to justify my non-participation within reality as responsible being by claiming that I have tried to stop picture reality within myself and go beyond but I failed and so I use failure as a justification to remain where I am instead of becoming practical being where I organize and structure the real path, where I construct a practical bridge for myself through which I can walk out of the mind reality into the actual reality which involves writing my patterns of how i exist as the picture presentation of myself, write out my automated relationship with other pictures ad within that understand how it all functions and how I have to correct and redesign these relationships into that which would support all being in existence
-Cap Sleeve Tee-Shade Clothing
After a few tough years of encouraging him through school, homework, tutoring and reading, it seems our boy has jumped a huge hurdle into a mindset of acceptance and (possibly) joy when it comes to his education. We are seeing less resistance. Sure, he still struggles. Sure he'd prefer to be outside running around, or inside playing his XBox than sitting in the four walls of a classroom, but it's not a fight anymore. He actually wants to go to school each day. Well, as much as kid wants to go to school each day. It's such a relief!
This is a great mystery, but it is an illustration of the way Christ and the church are one.
The Informationist is the story of Vanessa "Michael" Munroe, who is an informationist, a job that takes her all over the world gathering information for corporations, governments and other private clients. Her latest assignment is to find a wealthy oil tycoon's daughter, who disappeared in Africa four years ago.
and lower my head to be
Every year, the Doc gets excited reading the Beer Descriptions for the Holiday Ale Festival. Kind of the same way a child loves to read the Comic Strips! Just like the ongoing satire and irony found in most comics, The Holiday Ale Fest Beer descriptions have something in common.... They kind of look and sound like descriptions of reality, but not quite there. Either lacking in true definition or exaggerating the unaccomplished wishes of the brewer. Now, don't get the old Doc wrong! I find some of these beer descriptions to be on the button. Not many, but some. Other descriptions have no comparison to the real beer! That's where I have fun.... Trying to find the flavors profiles that are described vs. what I'm really tasting.
More can be seen at my website: www.customglassinteriors.com
And every evening, after my ten-hour workday and two-hour commute, the 19-page lists and shopping carts - printed with Epson ink costing $67 per milliliter - are shoved in my hand before I can put my purse away. Then I know what I can buy for them that particular day. Isn't that thoughtful? And all accomplished with such diligence, such attention to detail!
8) Vegetarian Oyster sauce, 2 table spoons
What happens when we suffer? We want immediate relief, and so we take anything that is offered. We examine it superficially for the moment, and we say that we have learned. When that drug proves insufficient in providing relief, we take another, but the suffering continues. Isn’t that so? But when you suffer completely, wholly, not superficially, then something happens; when all the avenues of escape which the mind has invented have been understood and blocked, there remains only suffering, and then you will understand it. There is no cessation through an intellectual drug. As I said the other day, life to me is not a process of learning; yet we treat life as though it were merely a school for learning things, merely a suffering in order to learn; as though everything served only as a means to something else. You say that if you can learn to contemplate you will meet life fully, whereas I say that if your action is complete, that is, if your mind and heart are in full harmony, then that very action is contemplation, effortlessness.
I still give my husband a hard time about that, wishing he would have at least recommended I put on a pair of jeans or brush my hair (or teeth?). But it was sweet of them to give me a party so I couldn't be too upset about it.
· erotica
The HHS estimates that obstetrical adverse events of some sort currently occur in approximately 9% of all deliveries and that 30% of them are preventable. The goal set for hospitals is to cut the number of these preventable events in half by 2013. Over three years this would prevent nearly 100,000 obstetrical adverse events.
"And the merchants of the earth weep and mourn for her, since no one buys their cargo anymore, cargo of gold, silver, jewels, pearls, fine linen, purple cloth, silk, scarlet cloth, all kinds of scented wood, all kinds of articles of ivory, all kinds of articles of costly wood, bronze, iron and marble, cinnamon, spice, incense, myrrh, frankincense, wine, oil, fine flour, wheat, cattle and sheep, horses and chariots, and slaves, that is, human souls." ~Revelation 18:11-13
The problem is that no man could do or can do it. It must be a work from within, a new heart; a new creation. Only God, the creator can do that and that only by grace. That’s why Paul wrote in 1 Corinthians1`5:10,
It's up to you and your group, but I feel like having them laminated as part of the exchange is something you won't regret. Some people will have to borrow laminators to make it happen, but after putting so much effort into creating the lessons, it's really, really, really nice to have them already durable and totally ready to go.
"It really is. What was the cowboy's name?"
It’s safe to say that I’m probably using sleep as an escape.
Perhaps he was scared that Trayvon would ice tea him to death or something. It just makes no sense to me.
Fulford’s free website at benjaminfulford.typepad.com features a letter from an official who is directly involved in the takedown of the Old World Order. I’d like to end this piece with some great quotes from that letter:
In fact, it annoyed me. I knew he was right, I knew he was wise. I know he’s good, but there are times, that his presense just is “too much” or “not enough” or “not at my timing” for me. Basically, Jesus doesn’t come on my terms. He only comes on His terms. Seriously, who does he think he is?
It would be interesting to know more about these changes and whether any alternative footage was actually shot – but, anyway, I’m glad to have seen this film, and hope one day to see it in a decent print!
It made me like them more.
Another 10 chocolate treats available from Old Time Candy. When was the last time you had any of these, Sisters and Brothers? Remember use the link below or along the right hand side to check out their selection and you'll also be helping out The Chocolate Cult so we can continue to bring you essays, reports, and reviews.
“Morning what?”
I can’t count how many times I’ve heard people rail against Toronto’s transit, but what’s worse is that they compare it to transit in places like London, which is just stupid. London built it’s underground 70 years or more before Toronto did — Montreal was supposed to be ‘Canada’s City’ but after they failed miserably over and over again Toronto had to step in and has since made that dirty amalgamation of strip-clubs into a poor man’s Toronto — and it is now struggling to build things in an era of environmental assessments and constant bureaucracy. London’s underground was built with little oversight and no regard of special interest groups.
Also, having a Grandfather that was a POW in Changi, there are many elements of the war I really would rather not know about. Yes I know, burying one's head in the sand is not acceptable, but when I consider how these events have no doubt shaped our entire family (and many other families world wide) for generations it is difficult to bring yourself to knowing and wanting to know more.
Just don’t describe him thus in Norfolk for fear of causing distress to the locals.
4 tablespoons olive oil
The Party Source spirits program is run by whiskey writer and enthusiast Jay Erisman, who has been working in the industry since 1997. The Rye 'n Barrel is his baby, and as far as I know, the only rye whiskey finished in a wine cask. It was Erisman who came up with the idea as part of his quest to find a whiskey that "explodes old boundaries and expectations."
Friend
Few of us will reach our potential without the nurturing of both the mother who bore us and the mothers who bear with us. I was thrilled recently to see one of my youth leaders for the first time in years. As a teenager who had absolutely no self-confidence, I always sidled up to this woman because she would put her arm around me and say, “You are just the best girl!” She loved me, so I let her lead me. How many young men and women are desperate for your love and leadership? Do we fully realize that our influence as mothers in Israel is irreplaceable and eternal?
Never one to do things the easy way….
"DANGER WILL ROBINSON!" because I HATE household projects.
Here are Beth and John channeling their inner Madonna and Crockett (Miami Vice for you youngsters)
It also works for these challenges:
I just adore having a fireplace. It is wonderful to be able to enjoy a cozy, roaring fire like this one in our home. I am insisting that if we move, a fireplace is on my "must have" list of things to look for in a house.
Coming soon to a computer near you...
Track grip evo during w/e: High
Colors seem to explode in my imagination.
There is no place in the bible where God remotely suggests that two people of the same sex should have sex or marry. I stand by what God has to say about the matter. What say you?
Finally after a couple hours I got that ole' bird to a point where I could at least try to attempt to get the guts out of it.
5) The rich are becoming filthy rich and the poor are becoming dirt poor and this is apparent within any single ethnic group. Racial unity is debased when social and economic justice have been ignored.
of a forgotten past
No problem, I was actually looking forward to seeing what she had been up to.
We walked downstairs and I gave her a few things I'd packed in a backpack for her. She was overwhelmed I'm sure.
Thats a pretty good reason to not use disposable diapers for me (or at least Pampers).
The shocking photos show several established left-wing members of the Stockholm cultural elite watching and laughing as Minister of Culture Lena Adelsohn Liljeroth slices a cake depicting a black African woman with minstrel-esque face.
Cornbread with Green Chiles (page 100)
But even then, I lived in my own little world, one in which knights really did rescue maidens on the backs of white horses, in which good always triumphed over evil, and in which one day I would get the lead part in a play. This life didn’t integrate well with the reality of junior high.
YES! This is, in fact, my favorite Mandy Moore movie besides Saved. I just adore her short brunette hair. Plus, her love interest is pretty much the kinda boy I longed for in high school: slightly bad, totally misunderstood, with a quiet sensitivity. Ha.
So... changing directions... I was looking for the perfect song to represent the above, when I saw a post by a friend (Hi, Lauren)... she is going through her "umpth" series of chemo/radiation for breast cancer. She was just told the cancer is back and very aggressive and she is starting her series... AGAIN. Today, she posted a song for her husband, who she loves so much... and I think her song dedication is perfect... and also perfect for how I feel about Jeff... for all you 80's fans... Modern English's, "I Melt With You."
So, how about that parrot, huh? This pre-code comic book story is invested with bawdy humor that mostly circles around the idea of a parrot convinced sexual relations with a human woman are not only within the realm of possibility, but worth single-mindedly pursuing at any cost. Lustiness aside, the use of a talking parrot as a story device brings to mind “The Pixelated Parrot,” a story by another master of comics, Carl Barks that appeared in 1950 (Four Color Comics 282).
We’ve learned from this little quarter-millennial experiment that only a system in which universal local militia service is codified can protect you in any meaningful way or preserve civilization in any recognizable form. Only the Constitutional prohibition of the universal local militia renders immune from the consequences of their misbehavior tyrants at all levels, from the greenest cop to the highest office holders, including the generals who will one day come to crush your own private Whiskey Rebellion. It is for this reason that the proponents of the Bill of Rights struggled to check what they saw back then as a Hamiltonian juggernaut aimed at the throats of the individual citizen. A struggle which has now proven to be in vain.
“BREAKOUT KINGS” Season 1 is loaded with exclusive special features including deleted and extended scenes and several must see featurettes including Good Cons, Bad Cons, Bullpin Sessions, and spotlight on Prison Break cross-over character T:Bag Dealt a Bad Hand.
JS – What annoys me about the Sheridan shambles is Scottish justice being brought low by courtroom mudslinging, deletions from the indictment, alleged perjurers charged but never prosecuted, huge payments to witnesses, evidence being withheld, and what is increasingly looking like a malicious, possibly even criminal, conspiracy involving self-confessed liars from a newspaper now defunct (having collapsed under the weight of allegations involving corruption and criminality) and a potentially biased investigation by police.
the front door. The paint color is Cooper Adobe Brown from the Valspar collection at Lowe's. I've now decided that I don't like the door window trim white, so I plan on painting it too when I put the second coat on today.
Visit the sites in order to find the authors of a number of London books written between 1850 and 1950. Now use the following links to answer the following questions. You may have to search a little.
Unfortunately, almost all A.A. writers and AA history writers have mischaracterized A.A. quiet times. Possibly because they were steering wide and clear of Jesus Christ and the Bible. Probably because they did not mention and did not want to mention the prerequisite “born again” surrenders. Mostly because they did not do their homework. In the first place, quiet time was and could be an individual thing, a morning thing, or a group thing; and it often was all of these. Secondly, some of the Oxford Group trappings of “journaling,” “listening,” writing down thoughts, and “checking” were just not a significant, if even relevant, part of Akron pioneer quiet times. Finally, almost invariably, A.A. revisionist-writers have left out the absolute necessity posited in Akron that one must become a child of God in order to pray effectively to, and hear from, God, their “Heavenly Father.” See Dick B., Good Morning: Quiet Time, Morning Watch, Meditation, and Early A.A.; The Oxford Group and Alcoholics Anonymous; New Light on Alcoholism. Notice particularly the Bible material in the second chapter of 1 Corinthians. The verses there speak clearly about spiritual wisdom imparted by God and differentiate it from the “foolishness” that the “natural man” (one who is not-born-again) can and does receive. The verses also point out that the natural man cannot even understand the wisdom imparted by God because it must be “spiritually discerned.” And Henrietta Seiblering often quoted this material to AAs.
American Airlines saved $40, 000 in 1987 by eliminating 1 olive from each salad served in first-class.
removers (dishtikan), ginger-man (alekar),
Obviously this is much MORE than it appears. This is a MARTIAL LAW DRILL in lifetime! NATO’s summit is just being used as an excuse. They DON’T require this much security!!
I do not know how or why it took me this long to see Kaneto Shindô’s Kuroneko. Shindo’s Onibaba is one of my favourite horror films of all time! During my Toho March feature I discovered the production company had many masterpieces that weren’t monster movies. I added Kuroneko to my library queue for the feature but alas, it only recently became available. Kuroneko can definitely be added to the list of Toho-produced masterpieces! Kuroneko is one of the most beautiful and haunting films I have ever seen! Like Onibaba, Kuroneko focuses on two female characters during war time. The two films are perfect companion pieces; each unique but sharing a similar pace and feel. I think I need to re-watch and review Onibaba soon! But today I review Kuroneko, which is a whole lot of awesomeness.
The next major thing is this quarry….any environmental reporter worth salt and pepper and chadon beni could make chow and a reputation with what going on in Blanchisseuse right now. the first thing you have to know is that this Blanchisseuse Quarry issue started to get sticky under the PNM and has only worsened under the People’s Panchayat because neither parties have an environmental policy worth anything.
Navigon USA ($30 + $14 for live traffic), popular GPS maker Garmin’s addition to the turn-by-turn navigation app pool, was very good. It offers a live traffic option (for a price) and maps you can pre-download. The pre-downloading of maps is a little annoying at first, because it takes awhile, but it seems to allow the app to operate much faster than apps that download information on the fly (like Waze). Of every app tested, Navigon was the fastest to respond with driving directions and was consistently telling me where to go with plenty of advance notice. The automated voice was also one of the best. The problem with Navigon, however, is that it’s really only better than Waze in that regard and on-par with Waze when it comes to traffic and general directions. Waze provides for free what Navigon prices at $44, so it’s hard to recommend that as a better option. While none of the GPS apps make it simple enough to quickly find the location and get directions (like the built-in Maps app does), Waze was much faster. Navigon required quite a few taps to get started each time. That said, if you don’t like Waze and want a paid app with pre-downloaded maps, Navigon is a good choice.
Total Fat 3 g
From the early sixties up until quite recently, perhaps the fall of the Soviet Union in the 90s, there seemed to be a strong, consistent anti-capitalist, anti-materialist protest movement that existed and was active across the world. It was primarily motivated by, but not excluded to, students, trade unionists and the broader left. In my opinion this was a great and noble thing. Here was a movement that went against the values of a burgeoning, and rapidly sprawling superficial society obsessed the material. That resisted the urges to merely consume, work and die, that despised the dead end 9-til-5 job, and bemoaned the yawning gap left by the waning religions, replaced in futility and desperation with material wealth and superficial greed. They called for community rather than individualism. They resisted.
I’ve resisted for six weeks or so, listened somewhat reluctantly to my son talk of his adventures in Skyrim, his discoveries of new locations, missions, and on occasions, glitches. Entering his room to ask if he has completed his homework, I stop and stare at his adventures, like an alcoholic passing a pub on his way to an AA meeting, taking a glimpse at the revelry inside.
You look at me, and suddenly it’s spring.
They could break the law on their own grounds but there was no allowance for God to alter a dispensation.
I have had an extremely up in the air, sporadic, apathetic, frustrating and lovely day today! I shant bore myself, or you, with the intricacies. Suffice to say, today was indeed the last straw! I’ma show people exactly what I am capable of tomorrow!! Just you wait!!
But how do we get people to live in "older, more industrial cities"? One obvious way would be to ensure that these cities actually contained some, you know, industry. But the country's economic policies have ensured that very few of them do; it's all been outsourced. Meanwhile, we've imported scores of millions of both legal and illegal immigrants, thus ensuring that native-born Americans must compete with the Third World for low-paying, entry-level jobs. Half of all new jobs went to immigrants, 96% of them to Hispanics. Why do our elites hate us so?
It's a water redirecting contraption. He stuck a chopstick to the outlet of filtered water, then turned on the tap - just a small flow - and the water can be directed to flow at a further target than what it initially was.
Well its Wednesday night - Yep half way through the week and Yes I have been absent. Sometimes - as others have said before me - Life just gets in the way..
It CAN change your life!!!
The tradition of a woman being the one to propose on Leap Day goes back a long way. According to Brewer's Dictionary of Phrase and Fable (an essential part of my library), "A Scottish law of 1288 says that 'during the rain of hir maist blissit Megeste, for ilke yeare knowne as lepe yeare, ilk mayden ladye ...shal hae liberte to bespeke ye man she like, albeit he refuses to taik hir to be his lawful wyfe, he shall be mulcted in ye sum of ane pundis.' " An alternative fine was a silk gown.
Her hair is snatched but not her pride and beauty
¼ cup liquid smoke
It takes a lot of confidence to walk out your door wearing gigantic sunglasses, sporting a bulbous wrap on your head, and bright red lips. You have to own it and be committed to the look. In addition to feeling secure, be prepared for the looks you are sure to get. If you decide to try June's trademark look, you better be able to sell it like Naomi Campbell on the catwalk. Head held high, strut down the street like theme music is playing with each step you take. Nothing less will be accepted. If you cannot picture yourself in the above scenario, please do not rush out and buy a bunch of turbans. They will collect dust and you will have wasted your money.
"Why'd you leave Iowa?"
"As a master distiller, you genuinely learn something new every single day, so I can't wait to supplement my knowledge of making Glenmorangie with something a little bit more old fashioned."
Last month, I mentioned that I was planning on showing you how I put a spread together, but the photos never got taken with all the wet rainy days we had. Instead, my plan is to just walk you through the layouts I completed this month and just share a bit of each. I do have one or two photos to share first of my desk workspace and how my PL stuff is organized in my studio. It's nothing special, but maybe just a little something to show you that it doesn't have to be a perfect setup!
Bags were packed with water bottle, snacks, juice boxes, puzzle book, kindle. What if we were lost, get hungry on the way, Adi is busy in one of the crafts shop and I get bored. So basically we just left the beds and pillows at home and packed everything under the roof with so many what ifs popping out of our mind. Isn’t this bound to happen when the mom-daughter duo is set to venture out whole day that too to unknown places just relying on GPS.
I caved in a while ago and got on some strong pain medication while we try and figure out What The Hell is Wrong With Me. Besides all the stuff we know is wrong with me by reading the lunacy you see here within these pages on a semi-regular basis.
Lester Bangs called this the most depressing record ever made. I don’t disagree, but personally think it’s more dark and heavy than depressing. Lou Reed takes a detour from his walk on the wild side and writes about a relationship that breaks down due to drugs and suicidal tendencies. This record has great sound and arrangements from Alice Cooper producer Bob Ezrin. Berlin is a concept LP that I can’t play very often, but when I do, the beauty of it is unrivaled by anything that Lou Reed has ever written. I wouldn’t argue if someone called this their favorite record ever, but its black hole gravity makes me hesitate to put it higher on my list. I’m afraid that somehow while listening to it, I’ll enter into the same downward spiral with no escape possible.
The fresh, soapy scent was like opium to me as I licked the salty bottom corner of her pussy, then used my tongue to stroke the half-inch stretch of her taint and took that flesh between my teeth and sucked, and she moved her pelvis in slow motions against me. After a few seconds, I probed her asshole with my tongue, reveling in the filthy taste, and I felt her finger or tongue touch my perineum, but that was as far as she could go, and that’s all right. L’s asshole tastes of dark bitter chocolate; I imagine mine just tastes of shit, and I don’t really want L’s sugar tongue anywhere near it.
I wanna know
Rucks says, “It’s either them or us. Our Bastion is everybody’s gain.” But is it? “Unfortunately there’s no explaining that to a simple beast,” he added, but I couldn’t help but think that that doesn’t make it any less right, and I started to distrust what Rucks had been telling me.
Surely, Canada’s economy of the future isn’t about balloons, cheese, bottles, coffee and doughnuts.
I received one or more of the products mentioned above for free using Mom Blog Society Regardless, I only recommend products or services I use personally and believe will be good for my readers
Leave to air dry for about 10 hrs or overnight.
I quilted a half inch away from the colored sides making this ridiculously easy to quilt. Maybe an hour.
Just another Psychedelic Saturday.
Both Schuyler Henderson and Arthur Farnsworth felt the massive explosion at their backs; Schuyler driving on despite the conflagration, Farnsworth holding back just for a second.
From left to right: Givenchy Vamp Pink(21), MAC Candy Yum Yum, Maybelline Color Sensational Fuchsia Fever, MAC Show Orchid, MAC Trimming Talk and MAC Lickable.
So after I got my jollies with the torch (it's much noisier than the propane torch and the flame is a little more...exuberant) I rifled through my purse for the myriad little notes I make throughout the day of things I think I should make. There were about 7 loose sheets of paper with scribblings and incomprehensible drawings and lists. One indecipherable hieroglyphic went in the trash (not sure what I was getting at) but the pendant below made it onto the workbench and into the shop (I was trying to keep it less ornate--this one involves no ball headpins). Deerskin lace in chestnut and buckskin colors, waxed cotton cord in navy blue, wood and lapis beads, pewter tulip-shaped endcaps, and silver-plated rolo chain from Lima. Hand-forged sterling silver S-clasp.
Now my responsibility is to serve and honor Him.
Anyway, they’re back in Europe, and after some fun meet-cutes with the Black Death (Christopher Lee probably had in his contract that his face would be so obscured with boils no one knew he was in this), they are charged with taking a witch to a monastery to stand trial for infecting the countryside with the plague. What follows is a lot of lame is-she-or-isn’t she blather, all conducted in the most contemporary language possible. There are rotting corpses, a bridge doing same, some wolves, etc., but the whole thing is pretty dull until the group makes it to the monastery. What happens there is nearly hilarious enough to warrant sitting through the middle of the film (the CG budget must have been about $15), but unless you’re a medieval historian – in which case Witch will most likely give you an aneurysm – this is definitely a hangover rental for the bad movie-loving crowd.
Does that ever happen to you or am I the only one?
Flight, hiding, or refusing to identify oneself are immediate confirmations of “loitering or prowling”; otherwise, the person involved must get “an opportunity to dispel any alarm or immediate concern which would otherwise be warranted,” by identifying him- or herself and explaining his or her conduct. But the police officer is judge and jury of that explanation; if the officer still “reasonably believes that the person’s conduct justifies alarm or immediate concern for the safety of persons property,” then a citation or arrest may follow.
The baklava was very flaky, with almost a strudel-like consistency, and it had almonds and chocolate on top. A very smooth orange and cinnamon combination was in between the layers. This was my first baklava ever, so I’m definitely going to try to find some other flavors! It set a nice precedent for that genre of dessert.
My girls love their new dress-up outfits from Vietnam, Ao Dai (pronounced Ao Yai in the south and Ao Zai in the north), the Vietnamese national costume.
All of these summer writing ideas for children are geared toward fun, imaginative, easy writing — a perfect formula to keep kids engaged and interested all summer long.
PM: Engage young talent to spur creative industries
Trim: She was beautiful.
I already know this, so I internally start panicking. I just don’t know how I can do it. How can I force myself to get more involved without inducing periodic panic attacks?
This is a hard set to complete at near mint condition as always with vintage sets only buy graded cards that are from a reputable company. Never buy vintage cards from aution sites unless you can trust the seller most are counterfit.
Already 9 percent of the company’s eggs and 20 percent of the pork served at its 7,200 restaurants are cage-free.
“Know that Sharia, warrior princess of Nazerak has spared your life this day.” So saying, she turned her back on them and left the underworld for the sun above.
All people of good minds of welcome to join this group, whether it's to learn more, give your silent support, whether you are related or a descendant or not (and all the Wabanahkiyik are related as are the peoples along the St Lawrence River), your input and especially your thoughts about what we can do about this are more than welcome.
Sentiment: Computer generated
I'm very interested to see what they come up with, and look forward to
At the Elevation.
Among academic associations the American Historical Association, the American Economic Association, the American Chemical Society, and the American Psychological Association were all started by members of The Order or persons close to The Order. These are key associations for the conditioning of society. The phenomenon of The Order as the FIRST on the scene is found especially among Foundations, although it appears that The Order keeps a continuing presence among Foundation Trustees… The FIRST Chairman of an influential but almost unknown organisation established in 1910 was also a member of The Order. In 1920 Theodore Marburg founded the American Society for the Judicial Settlement of Disputes, but Marburg was only President. The FIRST Chairman was member William Howard Taft. The Society was the forerunner of the League to Enforce Peace, which developed into the League of Nations concept and ultimately the United Nations.
We should be training and arming the Cypriot army and militias of dispossessed as well as those of Coptic Orthodox and Lebanese Orthodox and Catholics for their military returns to Egypt and Lebanon. The Albanian Orthodox, the Makedonians, the Kosovo Serbs. Lets really release the dogs of war.
Magic Tree was great, but the weather was starting to look serious so I decided to head for my shelter nearby. Even as I could see the shelter I heard a flock of seagulls, all calling together – a sure sign of a big storm. So I came back up the hill to the house.
i hope no one felt that i was judging them for coping differently to me. i swear, that was never my intention.
One of five finalists for the children's/YA division of the Oklahoma Book Award;
Select an operation to perform: q
1. Beautiful, wonderful, witty, wise and warm friends.
I made adjustments to the size of the scraps as needed. But mostly tried to match the size of the scraps rather than cutting them to the size. That way I would not loose fabric.
Attorney Christian: So you are saying that even though there was no one there to hear the big bang still it was a definite sound? Okay.
Anna is not only passionate, but she is also supportive and empathic, which is apparent in the comments she leaves for others around the blogosphere. The scope of her support is broad and available to any who are willing to receive it. For proof, check out her Twitter feed. Being sincerely compassionate requires courage, which Anna definitely possesses.
St. Marks in 1865, rendered in an early stereoptic photograph. The church itself looks pretty much as it does today. But the surrounding churchyard would be radically transformed. (NYPL)
The case is scheduled for trial next year. The Friday ruling means Samsung can continue selling Galaxy products for now.
For the last 15 years I carried around a bicycle lock in my shop work bag. Why? Because I knew one day I would need that chain. Well, the day finally arrived yesterday when I bought a brand new bike.
I: Okay. Now in terms Krishna Consciousness, when did that, was that part of Essential Logic or did that come later?
Also relevant is the four-part series "Why Be Social?" that appeared on The Book of Life podcast in 2009. You can listen to all four parts here: http://jewishbooks.blogspot.com/2009/08/why-be-social-whole-megillah.html.
